The first video message (which you can access here, by registering your email address with the Herb Fairies site), for instance, accompanies a link to a printable Viola coloring sheet. My youngest two (ages 5 and 7), who are not lukewarm about fairies, were thrilled to receive it.
You’re not guilty anymore, you’re not filthy anymore,
Ms. Mertes went on to marry a man by the name of Wright and had two children–Fred and Frances Marie. She died at a young age of bacterial pneumonia leaving her son and young daughter (only 4 years old) in the care of their father. Her daughter went on to live a full life–though she aspired to become a doctor, her father forbade her and she became a secretary. Her daughter though, went on to pursue a higher education and now I, her grandaughter am following in the footsteps of my Great Grandmother, Frances K. Mertes, and pursuing a career in the sciences.
484110 General freight trucking, local
Here is the first of what will be many shots of a work in progress:
Voice: I know, for I sat to him: I am the arch-angel Gabriel.
Communism, imposed on Russia in 1917, destroyed generations in the former Soviet Union, in the Peoples Republic of China, and still stunts life for millions today.
At the time, Mr. Kay suggested wider sidewalks at Ogilvie and Governor's, noting the existing pedestrian walkways are too narrow, and only exist on one side of Ogilvie.
One Way’s Peter and Young Sky started teasing ELFs today with some news about Super Junior.
He chose to go out of town in the last round, and the end result was that he came off as mishandling the event. Can he afford this again given that his campaign to date has been about his national leadership?
Pootle, her mummy, met with friends, shopped, and got her hair done, (yey for lovely things that mummies so often don't get to do!) and (hopefully) rested for a few days, before joining us Here for two nights. Oh I do miss my sister, and am in constant awe of those who have their loved ones nearby. We drank cider, had party planning sessions, fajitas, and evening walks around town (thanks to a willing fella, babysitting and sending us out for a couple of hours to catch up). There was the usual talk about the distance, and if something might be done, if somebody might move. Its not looking do-able for the moment, but we did make use of the time together. Next meet-up will be late July I think. Looking forward to it already.
Gulab jamun also known as "waffle balls," is a popular dessert in countries of the Indian Subcontinent such as India, Pakistan, Nepal and Bangladesh. It is made of dough consisting mainly of milk solids (often including double cream and flour) in sugar syrup flavored with cardamom seeds and rosewater or saffron. These days, Gulab Jamun powder is also commercially available, so the dessert can be prepared easily. Gulab jamun is common at weddings. I would prefer to make it from scratch.
That's 19lbs in 12 weeks - 1.58lbs a week. It'll be hard, but I really want to be there! Also, to be my final goal weight BEFORE all the holiday baking would be awesome lol
down the valley, full of recent rains.
ID process supposed to be governed by G.O. 4077--indpt. administrator, fillers must resemble description, don't reuse fillers, five fillers, administrator should give identical instructions, don't give feedback, and tell witness that suspects not necessarily present in ID array.
There has been a lot of making going on since last week, but I don't have anything that is quite finished to show yet.
Bring water to boil and add flowers. Simmer 5 minutes. Pour infusion over sieve. Discard flowers. Add sugar and ice. Serves 6.
02. She Loves My Automobile – 2:22
Who wouldn't love a homemade advent calendar!? I also love the little envelopes with numbers for each day... each one could contain a note for your loved one with the day magnet - maybe a little treat too! Find these and other cute decor ideas at Katie Bee Creative.
That’s why I drive this long black limousine
How about you? I love hearing about people's different Christmas preparations and it is part of why I love JYC so much because you really do get a worldwide perspective.
It’s rather like sending a solar invitation to dinner: the earth is at first the reluctant host, but when the package is delivered, the host welcomes the new guest with open arms.
In the year 2070 the Doctor and his friends landed on a base on the moon and defended it against an attack from the Cybermen and their plan to disrupt the Earth's weather. In another futuristic Earth colony run like a holiday camp the crab-like Macra took over and secretly enslaved the people.
The colorist, Hunter, talked her through the process of choosing a color – just one. Then she spent a long while unscrambling the egg, as it were. By then word had spread through the salon that a good deed was in progress and a stylist, Paloma, donated a cut and style.
What's most impressive about a dinner with the Pig Flyin's is how organised they are: every dish has been pre-thought with multiple components ready and prepped. Dinner service operates like a well-oiled machine, and by the time we finish one course, there's only a ten-minute wait until the next one. We all take turns to wander in to help, and there's never a sense of panic - just relaxed joviality that puts everyone at ease.
I will no longer live in California. I will no longer have family close by. I will have no friends. Am I going to regret this?
6. Tyler Wilson, Arkansas – Let’s see how good he is without all those NFL receivers.
Again please take note of my disclaimer from Camera Troubles, “I am not an Optometrist”, so I am not attempting to prove anything for or against medical science but observing our ability and capability.
Yikes! Sorry it's been so long since I posted! The Christmas season is catching up with me, and things have been busy! I'm officially done with my Christmas shopping, thanks to a couple long days in town. Our tree is up with lights on it, and we'll be decorating it tomorrow. I even got my hair cut! (thank goodness!).
it has been the most amazing weekend!!!
By all indications the ossuary itself was authentic and a valuable find for scholars. It was cut from the limestone around Jerusalem, carved in typical Herodian fashion, and showed no sign of tampering by modern implements, according to a handful scholars. It bore the Aramaic inscription, “Ya’akov bar Yosef akhui di Yeshua,” which renowned paleographer Andre Lemaire confirmed was written in the first century.
With this said, I reaffirm my Buckeye spirit and faith in our team to (literally) take it to the limits. We will continue to have The Best Damn Band In The Land, and we will continue to be the most ballin’ second place state that has ever existed. So to all you non-Ohioans, get ready…
“I can feel it,” he said, “time to go home.”
Here’s the fun part – you can’t do one exercise more than twice this week.
One thing to watch out for is to fully press the top of the cartridges (the end with the electronic contacts) into the printer.
So here's first Nadia's sketch and then my page.
The MR GUM books by Andy Stanton. Hilarious and pitch perfect. I also really like the David Walliams books. There’s something quite gentle and sweet about them, as well as irreverent.
Based on a book of the same title by Keith Walker, A Piece of My Heart takes up a subject largely missing from the reams of material written about the Vietnam War, namely the women who served there. Ms. Lauro has taken six disparate characters and created a complex yet complete narrative from their stories. The women (three nurses, one USA entertainer, a Red Cross volunteer and a military intelligence officer) are depicted before, during and after their service. Dealing with the chaos of life in a war zone, they each adapt and survive. Upon returning to the States, they must cope with issues of Agent Orange poisoning, alcoholism, and what is now known as post-traumatic stress disorder. A visit to the Vietnam Veterans Memorial brings a measure of peace and hope.
But I did enjoy the class. I found it to be informative and more technique-driven than the first Copic certification class I took. A person can learn something new every day--in fact, I really recommend it to keep your mind fresh, especially as you age. And I did learn some new things about color and using different combinations than I have done so far. I am very glad I went!
Oh, and she’s also allergic to Amoxicillin.
There are Warm Ups and then there are Warm the Joints Up…Two entirely different sexy beasts!
Out of all the types of food, breakfast food makes me the happiest! :-)
Just added a white Vneck long sleeve T with the sleeves hiked up a bit to show off my fun $12 watch from Kohl's. Added a simple necklace and my favorite silver gladiator sandals (I own one pair to try out the whole "gladiator" thing). And the key piece for me is the belt (which matches the silver in the shoes). This belt absolutely takes the outfit from ok to CUTE! It's a new purchase from CJ Banks, and that's ANOTHER shop I had NO clue was plus size?? Older demographic yes, but I can find something cute almost anywhere I go and this belt was such a find!!!! The picture on the website does it NO justice.
This is actually meatloaf (she made, and ate, three versions to get this one... some serious commitment to halloween cooking there!) and for some reason I felt better about serving this when I thought it was a form of grilled zucchini so I may go that route instead. BUT that doesn't mean it's going to stop me from serving this to my family for dinner sometime between now and then!
Do you feel for me how I feel for you?
On the occasion of Event Horizon, thirty-one life-size sculptures of the artist will inhabit the pathways and sidewalks of historic Madison Square Park, as well as the rooftops of architectural treasures of New York’s vibrant Flatiron District and environs. New York City landmarks to participate in the installation include the Empire State Building, the Flatiron Building, the New York Life Building, among others.
1. Tensions are extremely high between U.S. soldiers and Afghans The surge of disdain for the war “isn’t entirely surprising,” says Doug Mataconis at Outside the Beltway. The past two months have seen at least two controversial events: Shortly “after American forces inadvertently burned copies of the Koran” at a U.S. base, Army Staff Sgt. Robert Bales allegedly murdered 17 Afghan civilians, explosive events which, together, signal that the U.S. might be overstaying its welcome. This was bound to speed us along the “inexorable path to withdrawal.”
Continuing with my goat profiles, I would like to present Spice. She’s the darkest of the three and is the only 100% Boer. She is also registered so she is kind of a big deal and likes to remind the other two girls all about it. All 3 were bred to a registered buck, so I am hoping that I might be able to sell her bucklings (if she has any) for breeding instead of wethering them.
If a woman is not right, go and apologize ...
Baking powder- 2 tsp
20-something: I want to look like that girl from that music video!
I accepted for a multitude of reasons. I like Samhain's covers. (I hope saying that doesn't jinx me and doom me to a rotten cover now. :eye roll:)
Instead I thought I would give some do's & dont's that you might find helpful should you decide to attack a similar project.
Learning and putting into practice the art of dream-stealing will take you to places you never could’ve imagined you’d travel. Because when we plug into the dreams of others, when we avail ourselves of the wisdom and experiences, energy and courage and stories of those around us, what we do is craft acommunity of hope, imagination and innovation, creativity and camaraderie, compassion and loving-kindness. A kind of collective karma that is far stronger, more dynamic and more transformative than any earthly power.
My Favorite thing about IRELAND?!?
I have been sofa king busy at work I can't see straight.
They're not alone. Other kids know if they dissolve solids at the worst times,
Turns out I have an ulcer above the band. I'll be taking a bunch of medications that should help to repair the damage that's been done and I need to get another scope done at the end of June. Apparently my band is fine. But I'm pretty sure the fucking moron of a doctor didn't bother to read any of my patient history since he suggested I just get more fluid removed....ya know, from my EMPTY fucking band.
11. The Charioteer of Delphi is a great book for kids aged 8 - 12 set in and around the Circus Maximus in Rome. Flavia, Jonathan, Nubia and Lupus have to recover a famous racehorse which has gone missing!
If you feel you need some guidance, our wedding planning staff can help you with all the important decisions without the need to visit vendor after vendor. Our wedding coordinator can be contacted online to quickly provide information and a quote based on the specifications you provide. If you are unable to meet in person for any reason much of the planning can continue online. From the perfect flowers to a cake so stunning you’ll feel hesitant to cut it, our wedding planner can help you with all the major decisions to provide a stress free experience.
Decided to start an early start on challenges. Tackled Zig Zag Scrap Template challenge and used PRD's Simply Chic kit.
I stood at our suitcases as he vanished down an escalator, and I watched the clock tick past 3. We were going to be late meeting Erik. How long would he wait? How would we find him later? We didn't know his hotel; he didn't know ours.
- Noteworthy food & beverage program
As time goes on there will always be dates (Greg’s bday in jan, the day Greg asked me to marry him, the day I lost him, our wedding anniversary, day we first met, day he asked me to be his girl friend, etc.) that are rough and beyond difficult to get through.
i thought going a bit more clean/modern would be a fun change.
There is not much to do on the island if you are not interested in snorkelling or diving, or doing nothing… lucky all of those things were on our ‘to do’ list. Once we caught some zzzz’s we headed down to our own private beach to laze on the white sand and have a little dip. Only 4 minutes in the water and I got bitten by a damsel fish… the little ba**ard drew blood and everything… and I was worried about sharks!
That's what moms do. So let's stop fighting and start celebrating instead. Moms have an amazing ability to love and care for their children, no matter what the circumstances.
- ‘I just finished my new paper. Complete baloney from the first to the last page of course - we all know that free markets don’t work - but who cares, it’s what the paymasters want to hear.’
Welcome to Seven Questions, Arthur!
which I absolutely love!
Alaskan Brewing Co
I got another present too....
I say “resurrect’ because, let’s face it: we spent the past 30 years intentionally killing off the largest industrial base the World had ever known. The economists clamored for the “World Economy”, then the corporate tapeworms shipped everything off to other parts of the world, mostly China. Now, everyone in Washington says we’ve got to “get competitive” to win back the jobs and manufacturing we so recklessly gave away. But in the Brave New World Economy, “competitive” means working 14-hour shifts for 59¢ an hour without bennies, in dangerous, polluting factories churning out shoddy crap that breaks.
Use the same stamp and ink color on the envelope that you used on the card. This provides continuity between the card and envelope without disrupting the function.
Your teeth are your words
11:30 am CST May 6th (Beijing)
Last night Baseball Betsy and I wandered over to Bright House Field to watch the Threshers take on the Daytona Cubs. Jesse Biddle was on the bump as they now call it and he toughed out six innings without his best pitch, the knee buckling curve ball. It was hanging last night and as Sarge Matthews always reminds us ” if you hang it, they will bang it”. Jesse hung one to the Cubs Nelson Perez and it left the park over the second fence behind the flag polls in right center.
14 - 25Th Anniversary Song 00:30
So here you are. The chart is on page 4 of the PDF. I think I score between a 4 and a 5. I haven't jumped a real course for about a year, so who knows where I am with my jumping, but I think I can do all the dressage stuff. I've also never jumped a bank or drop jump, but I can do a 450 pace on a horse I know.
As you can see, we have listed one specialized area of study for each day. I will be honest here and tell you that we do NOT do each of these each week. Some weeks are good if we manage to do two or three of them, and on others we have actually done all five. My attitude about not getting to the "fun" and "special stuff" every day is that while everyone needs goals to aim for, we should also be content in doing our best...and since we are trying pretty hard, I think our best (for the time being) is actually quite good...though there is always room for improvement.
The truth is that the craft beer scene in Los Angeles - whilst evolving nicely - makes it somewhat difficult for you to get your hands (and, more significantly, your taste buds) on American-brewed craft beer.
Duke glances at the battered borg.
A decade to remember,
Stadium finalist in ‘venue of the year’ awards
And not surprisingly, much disinformation about NESARA can be found on the internet. Prominent nay-sayers include quatloos.com, which is rumored to be a CIA front; nesara.org which is maintained by the Bush family; Sherry Shriner; and various Internet channelers receiving their messages from telepathic spooks have all contributed to the confusion.
No fixed abode I own;
There are also things I will not be doing: keeping a garden that looks like something off of a magazine cover, keeping a house that looks like it belongs on a magazine cover, going to activities whenever the church is open, reading for hours upon hours a day, staying up until 3am, getting up before 8am.
Cake stand and Background BG10, BG000, C1
This professor wasn’t the only one who’d refused to trade out their arthritic joints last year. Premier Castol had, too—and every year beforehand. That old man even wore glasses. He was the only person I knew who did. He insisted he didn’t need prosthetics to be healthy. Most of the professors who’d been born at the end of the war were like that.
For more information or to sign up for your FREE team BeachBody account or to pre-order P90X2 (if you pre-order through me you’ll get FREE shipping, 2 free workout DVDs, AND it’ll get there by the holidays!) visit my site: www.beachbodycoach.com/coachlindsey01
The registering of a baby's birth actually passes 'ownership' of the baby to the Local Authority and that, THAT ALONE, allows the 'Local Authority' staff/officers and the Courts to take the child away from the parents if they ever wanted to do that. This applies until the child reaches the 'age of maturity' set by the current legal 'Statutes'. Doing that is not 'LAWFUL' but after the birth has been registered, it is 'LEGAL' and there is a WORLD of difference between those two terms, a difference which it is VERY IMPORTANT that
Follow the instructions above to make your own plastic bottle trap.
I said, "Sir, we don't have any medium-sized glasses. We only have large glasses and small glasses."
Apart from my daily intake of Omega 3, spirulina, wheatgrass, rejuvelac, enzymes, coconut oil and multivitamin (which altogether give me enough calories for a normal meal and loads of boosting nutrients) I’m only eating when I feel hungry. Not to be confused with a craving! When I’m hungry. The grazing that I was doing during Phase 1 has stopped as I don’t feel the need to chew things all the time anymore.
Merpel is all for merchandising and the legitimate exploitation of copyright and trade marks, but suggests that a possible IPKat toaster with a toast 'branding' option would be stretching the friendship ...
that i wasn't attending.
NATO is waging a war in Afghanistan, which means Afghans are constantly living in the unfortunate but necessary reality of night raids, drone strikes and civilian casualties. In this context, NATO has to convince the people of Afghanistan that their presence in the country is for their benefit and that NATO is on their side.
Waltz is one of my favorite dances, and Petra looked beautiful in this dance. The dress was gorgeous, her expression was perfect, and the choreography suited her wonderfully. Her improvement is huge, her posture is far better than that first Foxtrot, and she is finally learning how to comport herself with grace. She danced beautifully, except in frame.
You know, if these people really wanted the money, wouldn't you think they'd play along? Say "I'm so sorry to hear about Great Grandma Clareece. This is killing me having to ask for money at such a hard time, blah blah blah".... Wouldn't that really take the scam to the next level? I mean, I'm feeding this guy all the info. All he has to do is take my cues and run with them. Maybe I should get into spamming. I think I'd make a killing.
“‘The blue refers to the centrality of family life, a recognition of the importance of faith, a real commitment to the work ethic, a very casual but nonetheless profound patriotism that people feel about England,’ he suggests.”
The best lyrics I’ve ever heard, EVER! Foo Fighters are on a completely different level when it comes to making music. Every single one of their songs speak to you on a personal level, no matter who you are!
(speaks loudly)
1tbsp caster sugar
Jimmi
And that what the gods need from one person is different from another. The notion of service is a bit hard for modern folk to wrap their brains around. I would liken it to when I do other household duties for the mortal spouse.
For directions to make these topiaries click on the link below the photo.
State: A bit hungry and anxious
Glade Scented Oil Candle Holders $3.79
The seller I got the Hudson card from also had these Chipper Jones 2001 Topps HD 20 20 card. I was able to exchange a few more Photons for this card too! I'm a sucker for die-cut cards and I have always been intrigued by the Topps HD sets so this one was a no brainer to pick up.
READING: Pages 20-32 of the ‘Message of Hope’ book (Mark 5,6 & 7)
6. When Kent takes Rogan to school at noon, NO KIDS until 3:00pm. :)
Whose advice would you follow? How often do we get ourselves into a situation because we followed the wrong advice? Today we are looking at Acts 27:12.
dress: COS
I want to talk about emotions, more specifically emotions in your writing. The best stories invoke some sort of emotion in your readers. The stronger the emotion, the better your story. (With the exception of something that is truly offensive and/or disgusting).
-Deficiency of vitamin D causes decrease in calcium present in organism which in turn may cause rachitism in children and osteo-malacia in adult women; it also causes pain spasm and weakness of the legs, hands and chest. Symptoms are worse during winter and during pregnancy.
Tonight I made another yummy meal and I believe my husband liked it. I still wish he would begin cooking again, or even shopping for groceries for that matter. But you can’t have everything. And I knew a good thing when it was going on all these years, so at least there’s that ~
“N-no,” he said. “Though it’s against my usual practice, I’m sufficiently interested in your find to make an exception. What did you say was the name of the Leicester dealer who sold you the picture?”
Yes, I realize when one disregards a commitment with another, it is a reflection on her, not me, but I cannot help being hurt. I forgive (not forget) and give people the benefit of the doubt, but yeah, maybe I'm casting myself as a victim. But why does this happen?
I thought with the holidays fast approaching (a time when even the least bling-leaning of us tend to reach for the sparkle) it would be a good time to post a quick tutorial on how to colorize German Glass glitter with copics.
Finally, we should carefully note the elegant tapestry that serves as an internal evidence for the divine authorship of the biblical text. The tapestry of Scripture is a divine composite of surpassing brilliance and beauty. It is simply incredible that this exquisite masterpiece is fashioned from sixty-six books, written by forty different human authors in three different languages (Hebrew, Aramaic, and Greek), over a period of fifteen hundred years, on thousands of different subjects, and yet is unified and consistent throughout. How is that possible? The individual writers had no idea that their message would eventually be assembled into one Book, yet each work fits perfectly into place with a unique purpose as a synergistic component of an elegant masterpiece.
As a loyal servant of the Brain, all of this sounds unreasonably good. Mix of various styles? Sweet! New elements? Awesome! Another mastermind in addition to John Brown? Fuck me sideways! To be released this year? SHIT YEAH.
Now the blog. This was trickier as the blogger name had already gone. Wordpress, then. Pick a vaguely appropriate off-the-peg theme for now and put up a post or two promising what is coming.
Now, we were never mean to Sam, and actually liked him. Even when he called us “fuckin bums”, because we may have been only five or six years old at the time and actually thought he was funny. So there he would stand with a newspaper under his arm, his face flushed red and a bottle sticking out of his coat pocket. His old cane right in our faces as we played in front of our house.
What habit has you in such a grip that you run to it in the times of excitement and the times of despair?
I finally got myself to sit down and watch Cujo after having the disc for over a week and a half. For some reason I just could never convince myself to watch it. I’m not sure if it’s because I’d seen it before, or if I’m just tired of “old” movies, or if I wasn’t looking forward to watching another movie with a little kid as one of the main characters, or some other reason altogether. Whatever it was, there was definitely some kind of mental block that was just making me not want to watch it. Part of it may be that, since I’m still only halfway through Danse Macabre, and the next book I’m reading also doesn’t have a movie associated with it, there just wasn’t any sense of urgency involved.
I've been getting stuff ready for a vacation; my wife and I are leaving for southern Utah tomorrow morning, and will get back sometime Monday. Hope to have a good time and bring back a few interesting photos.
Off White Reclaim by Caromal Colours.
Our tour starts in Geneva, the county seat and home to a few movie scenes from "Road to Perdition."
The great news was that the lump was non cancerous but they removed it just to be sure. Lisa missed just one day at work and was so relieved to know that she was still in perfect health. The insurer paid the cost of her Specialist visit $400 and the hospitalisation and surgery costs of over $10000. Lisa just had to pay her $250 excess/deductible and the cost of the Doctor visit.
And, like last week's leftovers, spent, I stewed
As you can see, below, she has gotten quite a few pledges! If you click on the image, you will go to the Kickstarter page and you can see all the (highly collectible) items that you can get for your generous pledges. If you decide to pledge an amount that gets you a book, remember that this is a "pre-order" as the books are not printed yet. Personally, I want the $1000 bundle with a couple of those Yuki Yetis thrown in! (But not "thrown" hard. Yuki looks like a real softie.)
It is this mast, I suspect, to which Ben Brafman will nail his colours – viz, undermining the credibility of the witness….perhaps via that route to suggest consensual sex as part of a set-up, perhaps in order to suggest she is a neurotic fantasist who made the whole thing up.
The image on the top is Take a Spin from Stampin' Up and I added a spinner I found in my stash. This time I mounted the spinning wheel on a petite scalloped circle and added a banner tag on the top with a charm. The spinning wheel is popped up to leave room for the twine and still give it a flat plane to spin freely.
Inducing Spirits: Oscar Masotta’s Apperceptive Participant
Engineer Steve Albini (Scott Weiland, Iggy & the Stooges) inflicts his legendary learned alchemy, and pushes these recordings masterfully. The recordings were done in a fresh new studio called Oxygen Studios. Just the name of the studio makes me want to get myself a tank full Oxygen Gas, mix in some nitrates and explore the realities of FULL OF, under the blanket of the Canadian nite sky. Now go ahead and melt the mind in the dark halls of Eagles, Tigers and Lions. I think I hear a sound - KASH FULL OF....(you fill in the blank!)
U.S. presidents have limited ability to affect gas prices, which are determined in international markets.
If you don't have ADHD, try to imagine what it feels like. First, turn on the tv and the radio. Then ask a friend to talk to you. While all this is going on, sit down and try to do your homework. Can you tune out all the distractions and do your homework? Can you talk to your friend without paying attention to the tv or radio? Some people with ADHD have trouble sorting out the many sounds, sights, and thoughts that demand attention. They do not know how to focus on just one thing at at time and tune out the rest. One person with ADHD described how it felt when he tried to do something as simple as read a book: "My thoughts raced round and round in my head. It's like my mind was a pinball machine with five or six balls smashing into each other."
the health risks? they include pneumonia, blocking the air passage if the tube goes down the wrong passage, and most shocking of all is the fact this is “diet” operates on the idea of putting a body into a state called ketosis, where the body isn’t receiving carbs so it burns fat instead. The NY Times article about this describes this condition lightly, saying it ”might lead to bad breath and stress the liver and kidneys,” making it sound like no big deal at all. Can we just pause and go back to the “stress to liver and kidneys”…as in vital organs! take it from someone who has an eating disorder and has damaged both liver and kidneys… it isn’t something you want! it takes “dying to be thin” to a whole new meaning. i can’t believe that any doctor would put a healthy woman into this position, of severe restriction and offsetting the body’s natural functioning.
This is a very sweet short story, originally written as a song, about a parents love for their child. I don't think there could be a nicer book to have on the shelf if you have children to remind them of your unconditional love for them. The illustrations, colorful, bright and cheery, are just a sweet as the message itself. It is just an adorable book to be loved by all, young and old alike.
I purchased this headset both as a back-up and to have a headset that would be better in the car or when I am out where there might be some background noise.
It’s always The Atmosphere people mention to offset accusations that you can see it all from the telly, that you don’t need to go to such events. As I know from cricket, the telly is great, but the atmosphere is something else. It is so genial, so optimistic, so out of the norm of the day to day. So bloody lovely.
But I really write to get things out. If I were to start writing because I thought about people reading it, well then I wouldn’t be writing as me and what I think and how I think. If people read it then it is fine, if it helps someone, then that is great. If they want to tell me that is exactly how they feel, then I am happy for them to do that.
Even cooler is that the guy informed me he wasn't looking for much because he had received the card as a throw-in, and was just happy to see it go to a good home and a collector who would appreciate it. Hell, he even insinuated a dollar or two would suffice, but I'll definitely be sending him the five bones he originally requested. It's my newest Getzlaf, and one I'm really happy to have.
At this point, rather than doubling the length of this post, I would ask you to read a previous post of mine – Who’s In Charge, which outlines the mistaken idea that the conscious mind is somehow the primary authority that needs to be obeyed.
Capitalism Is The Crisis: Radical Politics in the Age of Austerity examines the ideological roots of the “austerity” agenda and proposes revolutionary paths out of the current crisis. The film features original interviews with Chris Hedges, Derrick Jensen, Michael Hardt, Peter Gelderloos, Leo Panitch, David McNally, Richard J.F. Day, Imre Szeman, Wayne Price, and many more!
To identify these effects of natural selection, Jin et al. (2011) used two methods on a large sample of African Americans (5,210 individuals). They first looked at various genomic regions to see whether the degree of European admixture was higher or lower than the admixture for the genome as a whole, estimated at 21.61%. Such deviations would be “signals” of natural selection favoring certain genetic variants at the expense of others.
I chose the low style.
It has implications for us all.
in her eyes:
Beside him was an owner of billboards.
Band of Brides demands more punk! More rock! More women raising hell on stage! More women producing loud noises through amplifiers!
I had very unusually left the house today without a book in my purse. Also unusually, I took the light rail to go see a movie (If you’re not familiar with the light rail, it’s a type of train which is part of Sacramento’s public transit system, and provides for many interesting experiences. I recommend that everyone try it at least once).
Except I’ve found myself doing this when I’m not really paying attention anyway and then after I’ve agreed with them some of the keywords they’ve said have floated into my head and I realise that I definitely don’t agree so next thing I know I am like this crazy lady, flapping my hands about, and having to then disagree with what was said. At this point it’s obvious that I nod, smiled and agreed. This is worse when it’s someone who knows me really well because they know how easily I zone in and out when people are talking to (at?) me so then all I hear about is how I don’t listen to anything or how they should’ve known because my eyes glazed over (if my eyes glazed over then why the fuck did you keep talking brainiac?!).
“I want to be a chef.”
Roberto Mancini, knowing United would have to come out and seek an equaliser in the second half, made a defensive change and his full-backs attacked rarely in this half. Nasri and Silva switched flanks but this seems to have been just to mix up their forward line and perhaps get Silva involved more often as he had a pretty quiet game by his standards.
"In this world, there is no absolute good, no absolute evil," the man said. "Good and evil are not fixed, stable entities but are continually trading places. A good may be transformed into an evil in the next second. And vice versa. Such was the way of the world that Dostoevsky depicted in The Brothers Karamazov. The most important thing is to maintain the balance between the constantly moving good and evil. If you lean too much in either direction, it becomes difficult to maintain actual morals. Indeed, balance itself is the good. This is what I mean when I say that I must die in order to keep things in balance."
when we woke up at 5am to walk the dogs, this is what we found: dead silence, an creepy feeling of being buried/stuck, trees, power lines, limbs down EVERYONE, and our neighborhood looking completely abandoned.
Then there are times where I feel like it owes me something. When I cannot find the answers I sometimes feel betrayed. I hate music for these reasons.
Just what are my plans for this week?
Now isn't she sweet! It was a wonderful digi image to work with and if ole fuddy duddy here likes Amy and the rest of the digital goodies over at Crafty Sentiments Designs I'm sure you will too.
What suggestions would you give a pastor or leader regarding those who are cautious about being touched or approached?
1 can black beans, rinsed and drained (you can sub kidney beans if you prefer)
After we found enough people to talk to today, we ended up going to a pagoda in the city. It’s one of the oldest, and it was huge. Unfortunately, I didn’t bring my camera with me because I thought I was only going to be working on the food study today.
Feed bucks
Here's a side-shot of the card, showing the shiny popped up numbers and the wiggly banner:
Many of the recent findings of research into the neuroscience of music are extremely compelling. It has become clear, for example, that musical experience provides a crucial and not necessarily replaceable stimulus to our cognitive development, and forges links between the different areas of our brain responsible for hearing and movement.
Don’t Sweat. Don’t Laugh. Don’t draw attention to yourself. And most of all, whatever you do, do not fall in love with one of them.
3) At About Midnight
“There is, then, no intention in any way to limit discussion concerning the concrete choices made by Pius XII in the situation in which he lived. For her part, the Church affirms that these choices were made with the pure intention of carrying out the Pontiff’s service of exalted and dramatic responsibility to the best of his abilities. In any case, Pius XII’s attention to and concern for the fate of the Jews – something which is certainly relevant in the evaluation of his virtues – are widely testified and recognised, also by many Jews.
While the lentils are cooking, heat the extra-virgin olive oil in a large deep skillet. Add the onions and cook until tender, about 7-8 minutes. Add the garlic and cook for 2 more minutes.
To a rational person — to whom the sanctity of life is everything — these statistics say it all. I can rest assured that if I haven’t heard from my daughter — far more precious to me than allegiances to a country — she is just busy (or naughty).Reproached by a reader who says that those “who’ve already left have a responsibility to give us hope and not rub our noses in how bad we have it here”, her answer is that as a writer she has “only one obligation and that is to the truth” and her “mandate doesn’t include making people feel better in the face of reality”.
Answers lead to more questions.
*quick question-you think the homeowners with these pools ever use them? My guess is a big fat NO! Is that not always the way-take for granted the things you have! You can bet I would be splish splashing around everyday if I had one of these!!!
German musician, philosopher, theologian, physician and missionary
With its size and heterogeneity, Asia arguably displays the greatest diversity in responses to typical research questions especially scales. Japanese and Koreans are notoriously ‘mid-point focused’ on 5 or 7 point Likert scales, rarely using the extremes, whereas in the Philippines a Top 2 box score of 65% is often deemed mediocre. In 1992, Dr. Lynn Lin, (then of BASES) showed that to correctly interpret seemingly identical responses across Asia’s markets required significant refinement of the raw scores with the aforementioned countries at opposing ends of the ‘re-calibration’ spectrum.
Myths and Myth Busters of Repair and Parts Websites
All them memories.
I don't know exactly when I started, but I think it was around New Years Day. What started off as a fun thing to do, has since turned into a 4 hour a day habit. Everything is suffering as a result. My yard, my blog, and even my beer.
Many friends and family have asked "How are you guys?" or "Where are you guys at now?" or "What is new with you guys" and so on.
And wonder what the skies have swept into this day.
Above: The gorgeous Amber Room (Yantarnaya Komnata), Catherine Palace. Considered by some to be the ‘Eighth Wonder of the World,’ it was stolen by the Nazis during World War II. Starting in the 1970s, it was painstakingly recreated from the original drawings and reopened to the public several years ago.
As a family history nerd, this kind of thing normally makes me giddy: my great-grandfather's saw, for example. But I know very little about Shaun's grandmother (she died when he was in college). I know she was extremely frugal, and did not have an easy life. She raised six children without indoor plumbing until the youngest was at least in junior high school. She was not, as I understand it, terribly sentimental, an attribute I tend to attach to everyone in my past, because I am so very sentimental myself. And so, holding her camera, which she took very good care of (she saved the instruction booklet it came with, and had a fine leather case for the camera and her multiple lenses) felt very strange. This woman's grandson is my husband: my daughter is genetically 1/8 her. (Well, mathematically. Or something. I don't know enough about genetics to just leave that sentence unattended). But I just discovered she was a photographer last week. I've never seen one of her photographs, or eaten cookies made from her favorite recipes. I don't know her from anyone. But she raised the man who would raise the man I would marry. It sort of breaks my brain.
We’ve tried many, many forms… new ones, old ones, and trial therapies. none of them have ever been effective enough to continue based on doctors and therapist reports.
The key ingredients to make both recipes are whole Roma tomatoes (Lidia says that canned are just as good). I used California grown San Marzano-Style tomatoes which are truly flavorful. Yes, I had Saffron. I buy it at Trader Joe's for a reasonable price (because it's a small amount). The saffron is to give a pretty golden color to the pasta. The sauce is super easy to make:
Seriously, it takes faith to trust God’s diversity. He sure uses “interesting” people.
Thank you Spellbinders for giving me another year!
This is a bad bill for New Jersey. It will be a bad law if it becomes one.
like memories of who you used to be.
My Kindle was looking a little empty so as I had a craving for period drama... extravagance... and excess of the French kind... I downloaded these... and I ordered the others for my bedside table... When I get in the mood to read about something I go the whole way...
You always need to have the ability to get water. The most days without water that a human can survive without is three days. Whether you just think storing ‘enough’ water purification tablets is enough, you need to have a filter. No matter the size, just get what can sustain you/your family.
While Calabrese didn’t write a formal business plan, he did conduct significant research on what the competitors were charging, what services they were offering and how to conduct a quality inspection before opening his company. His business took off and within two years, he was taking more inspection requests than he could handle.
Have you tried Distress Stains yet? What do you think of them? I'd love to hear! And remember to go check out my full review over on Craft Test Dummies!
And he'll have good times
“You are already living in a competitive world! If you can’t compete, you can’t survive! that’s all it! Go to North Korea and farm there if you don’t want competitions!”
O God our Father, as we begin this day, bestow upon our household that grace which shall keep us in the fellowship of the Christian way, and grant unto each one of us that guidance and control which shall maintain our hearts in peace with one another and with thee. Help and prosper us in the doing of our various duties; and defend us from inward evil and from outward harm so that when the day is ended it may leave us not in sorrow, strife, or shame, but in true unity and thankful rest; through Jesus Christ our Lord. Amen. (from the 1965 edition of the Methodist Book of Worship)
Repeat with the green icing, filling in the leaf.
I had a fantastic day hanging out with them… ALL DAY! Sat on the couch, cuddled with Soren, pet the cat, chatted with Kira, helped her pack up Soren’s bedroom and watched about 14 episodes (I’m not kidding) of Steven Seagal: Lawman. I actually enjoyed it! Dan brought us iced lattes in the afternoon and then we had Arabic food for dinner…. yum! An all around fun day!
they cast their spell upon the River Stour,
Yet, according to a recent slew of discomforting news reports, the economies across the pond would still flatline in seconds without constant life support. Here, an April 18, 2012, Wall Street Journal writes:
BUT NOT ONLY THAT -
I'm a Cape Cod girl, born and raised there, and now I'm in inland NC. I miss the ocean and therefore anything nautical is near and dear to my heart. Recently I've found a fondness for compasses and anchors, especially in jewelry so I really like this. Not to mention $4.99 is an amazing price for any necklace!!
With the mandatory evacuations of coastal NYC and the scheduled shut down of mass transit at 12 noon today, no to mentioned the forecasts of 60+ MPH winds, its not wonder the shot won't be going on any time too soon.
salvia greggii
brushing two or three times
Holy crap, I just went to check my blog and it said the blog didn't exist.
It's a very, very interesting story. I'm finding, once again, that the man I was once married to is like a rotting onion. With seemingly endless layers of stink. A bad onion that has made me cry for the last time, sisters. Oh...and Secretary? She's right there with him. Like Batman and Robin. Or Beavis and Butthead. Pinky and "The Brain" (that one made me GOL, guffaw out loud). I'll come up with some more monikers this weekend, when I have my hens gathered 'round and we toast this good news.
began to speak to her and somehow,
He learnt for the ﬁrst time that there was no law of transmutation as in his innocence he had supposed . . . but that every word in both Latin and Greek was to be individually committed to memory at the cost of years of plodding.
Costa Messa
Learning from each other
Trial Dates:- 24th - 29th April, 1961
I dislike slower walkers. I’m not talking about people that have an inability to walk fast. I’m referring to those that take up the entire sidewalk or walkway without moving out of the way. There is limited time in a day to accomplish everything that I’d like to do. So I would appreciate it if you could leave some space so I can overtake you. This reminds me of two slow cars driving side by side and disregarding the intended use of the passing lane.
Where's the first place your passport would get stamped?
-Wealth
Ten minutes after he went outside, all hell broke loose. Contractions started coming every three minutes and I could barely see straight the pain was so intense. I tried calling my sister, but she wasn't answering her phone. I had no idea what to do. I went outside and started yelling for my husband to come in, but he couldn't hear me over the din of the pitching machine and the cracks of his homerun hits. I started crying in absolute fear and so did Sylvia and Johnny. All I could imagine was me trying to drive myself to the hospital with two kids in tow while in a constant state of contractions. After several minutes of fruitless screaming of my husband's name, I finally called him on his cell phone and lo and behold, he answered it. I said "The baby is coming, right now." He rushed inside and we waddled (actually I was the only one waddling) out to the car. Seeing as how we didn't have Sylvia's carseat, we had to cram her into the rear-facing infant carrier. Poor thing. She was all smiles though so at least that part was easy. The hard part...what were we going to do with the kids? Obviously, from my track record, we probably had less than an hour before the arrival of Alex.
As you can imagine that worked out terribly.
My kids work HARD. They know how to work. They know what I expect. They don't always give 100% all the time... and they know that I am really not happy with them when they don't give me their all.
The places I had planned for us to go
Lug end style : Straight End
7 Set The Controls For The Heart Of The Sun
What I love about neat is your innate sense of style
I wanted to take this concept one step further though using images taken specifically for an ad so I shot a quick test of my friend running in the rain one afternoon. The image at the top of this post is an outtake from this initial shoot.
Well I am off to bed to attempt to get at least 8 hours of sleep. Night Night!!
My stoic eldest simply looked at me calmly (and somewhat quizzically.)
Ben has been playing musical bedrooms with all of us, but he seems to find his way into Cole’s room the most. Lonnie and I often peek in on our way to bed and find Ben curled up at Cole’s feet. I guess there really *is* something about a boy and his dog. He also has no qualms about finding his own space within the family. He commandeered Zoey’s pillow during a recent family movie night. :-)
- The recipe from The Modern Baker by Nick Malgieri. Since I am a (very lax) member of the The Modern Baker Challenge, and the group has agreed to not post the recipes baked from the book, I'm not including the recipe. I can give you a glimpse of the ingredient list, though: all-purpose flour, baking soda, salt, cinnamon,
“Well, thanks Brad. I mean for calling. Is that all you wanted?” Gladys waited while there was a long pause from the other party.
AETV focuses on the quirky, charming, bizarre, entertaining and talented characters of Austin, Texas. In each one, we go into our guest's world and ask them to teach us how to do something or tell us a story. It was invented last summer by me and about five dudes, and we're super pumped to finally share it with you!
The design team have made more amazing creations for your inspiration!!
Bag: Chloe
1pc egg yolk
Add the coconut milk, fish stock, and fish sauce and bring to a boil.
*Run like the Wind” Kites, wind chimes, etc.
5,000 meters on the rower in 24:48. Not bad for my first row in long, long time. Then I kind of floundered around. Upright rows, chest flyes, ab crunches, dead lifts, etc, etc.
It involves risk, and I don't like risk. I'm much better with controlled.
Each expert group of teachers was responsible for learning and teaching one set of ‘pop’ rules. For example,
After feeling that my jaw had been open for long enough for my tongue to completely dry out, I took a sip of soda and regained the ability to speak. I couldn’t though, so I went to play with the dogs to regain my composure. After returning and explaining how and why this was utterly wrong to a child who is repeatedly told to look to teachers as trustworthy authority figures, I explained how this is bullying and unacceptable.
08-25 Copenhagen, Denmark - Rosenborg Castle
We plunked tubes in the river at one end of the resort and slowly floated in the cool water around the bend to the other side of the resort. The 30 minute float took us past limestone houses, plantation style homes and flood-proof homes built on tall columns. The short float was ideal for our family, with different groups going in all directions at any given time as various whims were satisfied. One day we completed the float four times, with different family members joining in for one trip or another. If we had an hour between activities we could fit in one loop; if we had no plan we could complete multiple loops until someone came up with a plan.
Dad, noticing the senator sitting next to him, leans over and whispers, "You see that woman over there with her hand on the Bible, becoming President of the United States ."
And then there's this....
As soundless as the Ghost of Poverty,
Genevieve Graham's characters really go through the wringer to get to their happy ending!! How much more can these two endure? Yes, there was more violence than I would have liked to read about, but I knew that going into this book. Graham's characters are so strong in their convictions though, you can't help pulling for them through all of their un-ending struggles.
I'm not scared of commitment. Somehow I've never been. I picked a car real fast, I choose a condo, picked a college (maybe 4), and said yes to a man I knew 15 minutes who became my world by just asking me out to dinner. Perhaps it's an only child thing or maybe the disappearance of that lonely feeling I had for what seems forever or maybe it's the possibility of a life with someone awesome! I know tho I will freak out like any normal person a lil bit before I take that big step into marriage but for right now I'm cool with taking next steps. I'm not sure other people are like me tho...I'm sure they're not like me.
The ephemeral nature of this phenomenon is part of the allure. That precise moment of intense immersion, that amazing connection with nature, will never repeat. The sun’s rays may not hit the grass with exactly the same angle or intensity. The grass will change tomorrow, perhaps drier, taller, or shorn. This transient moment of staggering beauty must be absorbed and cherished.
I legged it, pledging never again. I brushed past someone French. He was leaning against his girlfriend. He was complaining. “Jamais non plus,” he said, “Hell is other people.”
Touching your skin
This week's Tuesday with Dorie helped me to dream of a tropical paradise. It was Tropical Crumble, and it was my pick - so exciting!
We heard from students from the Bartlett, Columbia, and the Arid Lands Institute, seeing proposals for urban-scale fortresses made from freshwater injection wells, artificial troglodyte homesteads in Long Beach constructed with from rocks harvested from San Gabriel debris basins, crawling bagpipe-machines (actually built!) that walked around London powered by bike pumps and bleating like sheep, pollution-harvesting devices in the skies of southern California that will collect dust and carbon through electromagnetic attractors, future climate-prediction mechanisms and the networked sensorscapes that make them possible, synthetic orchards, mobile well heads, resistance-powered lamps in the chaparral monitoring seasonal windspeeds, "kit architectures" for unstable landscapes, "cloud dispensers" and other augmented climatologies, machine-cowboys overseeing herds of hydrotropic robots on the dry bed of Owens Lake, groundwater filtration interfaces for sites where the hills hit urban flatlands, open-source bio-fuel experimentation labs run by amateur genetic engineers, urban oxygen gardens, experimental greenhouses running test-climates for a future earth, and a dozen other projects, all of which will continue to be developed, tweaked, or abandoned as the workshop moves on.
Hope you all had a great holiday season and a Happy New Year. I don't know about anyone else, but by the time New Years day arrives, I am SO OVER THE HOLIDAY season. All I want to do is to take down all the decorations I was dying to put up only a few weeks before.
The Other Life was one of those books in which I loved just by reading a few pages. And its mainly because of the writing. I love her writing style. It’s pretty much similar to Shatter Me by Tahereh Mafi. There were those same feelings of confinement, claustrophobia and freedom. The counting of days, hours, minutes and even seconds of how much time really has passed by constantly driven by numbers. How much these figures can really get to you.
Mom made these delectable waffles for us to eat for breakfast on Saturday. We got to use our new waffle maker again! Here is the link to the recipe:
Go on, call a few friends, head to Sentosa, and go to iFly after school/work on Wednesdays, and have a laugh at each others' flying skills. Lol~ And just enjoy a first-time together. These days everyone seems to have tried everything, but this is kinda new, so it's great for bonding!
Of this 2002 version, the New York Daily News said: “The movie adds nothing to the political dialogue, and the love story is mood-killingly sad. The lure of the exotic can be deceptive, it says. The moody, murky atmosphere leaves nothing clear except that mixed intentions will always yield mixed results.”
Downstairs in our library, amongst a gaggleous mountain of books, we have a large shelf of records crammed together so tightly that it's almost impossible to pry them apart. Looking for the album cover, I started at one end of the shelf, then worked my way toward the middle, prising and peeking.
She heard ringing in her ears and did not know whether it came from the returning knights or her traumatic head injury. Slowly she sank to her knees, her strength fleeing in defeat, strive as she did to hold on to it. The knight advanced, madness gleaming in his eyes, hands like talons. Then he stopped.
I was attempting to share some pictures of the bbq with you and it was just infuriating. Trying to design a decent looking layout for the post brought back the headache I got rid of this morning. After a few tries at figuring out the method to their new madness, I gave up. I knew that it was time to move to the next spot.
Take my first trip to Whole Paycheck. I mean, just as an example, y'all.
made to keep out germs but rather made of Pine if
Arabian Fig Jam Recipe
Sweet butterfly hat for a tiny tiny baby. Baby doll pictured has head circumference of 12".
Stand by.
and the worst par is that, i dont know what was it that im allergic to so even if we have it in the house we dont know what to get rid off...and to make matters worse, ive done/touched/ate nth out of the ordinary, nothing that i haven't had b4...so it really confuses me that allergen it is....right now i have a allergy doctor's appointed at NOv. 2nd... and b4 that i dont think i can put on make up or at least until this thing goes away for good....
5. SWEET!!!!!!!! I'm almost done!
Like I have said before I haven't been very good about posting on our wedding although I thought I would have tons of stuff to chat about. I think there is just so much to blog about and I haven't had the chance to get all these things out. I really had the greatest day so I find it so strange I have had a bit of bloggers block about it lately. (I think I'm in a bloggers rut in general lately)
“It’s the o-o-only way to fly.”?Western Airlines
I stuck with that single design until I found Karen McTavish's books in 2008 and learned McTavishing. I'd say that was a huge turning point - reading Quilting For Show, a book that is basically a blueprint for creating show winning quilts.
- The remains of four pieces of printed trade label are affixed roughly centrally on each edge, perhaps used to hold it within a frame or mount at some stage in its history.
I read a lot of blogs. Sometimes I find myself thinking that, compared to others, my little ol' blog is just simply uninspiring.
And if you're really bored, don't forget the "Left and to the Back" Xmas Spotify playlist, and perhaps even our main playlist which isn't festive, but I get the sneaking suspicion a lot of people have forgotten exists (me included, actually - I need to update that quite soon).
2 teaspoons Tabasco sauce
Dr. Ferrara clasped her arm and quickly helped her down from the table and onto her feet. Before Kathleen made it out the door, everything shrunk away into black.
But is this true?
Susan's gift was handmade. It was a wine bottles & beer bottles spray painted with chalk board paint. Each person got 3 bottles & chalk. Such a cute idea!
1/2 to 1 tea ground cumin
It's all very strange and a discussion quite limited to the world of global frequent flyers; the art world, understandably, takes no notice of these rooms at all.
Try as I might i couldn’t finish my shopping on time. The staff had all magically disappeared the moment the news about the tsunami came on. (i continued shopping because various channels gave various news about the tsunami and whether we should be worried or not)
“The experience of Greece, Ireland and Portugal shows that market confidence can unravel pretty quickly. Italy’s fundamentals are stronger than, say, Spain’s, but if the market loses confidence in a country, then such things don’t matter. “
Do you think Jason Segel, Hillary Clinton and the Muppets could make for a humorous combination? Let TLH know what you think.
Latin 3: Study for a test on Caesar Gall., pp. 1-20.
McKnight has been fighting off a brewing backlash since he unveiled the preview, but there are others who’ve enjoyed what they’ve heard thus far.
Rock Lobber
With the line between reality and dream consistently blurred, Camelia turns to pottery to get a grip on her emotions. She begins sculpting a figure skater, only to receive frightening premonitions that someone's in danger. But who is the intended victim? And how can Camelia help that person when she’s on the brink of losing her own sanity?
http://screammonkey.wordpress.com/2012/05/01/newbie-blogger-initiative-start-your-blog-now and I thought hey I have a blog with 2 posts, and the itch to write more so lets give this a chance. SO i intend to get a few posts queued up for the next few days and get this baby cooking
My passion for all things junk/vintage/antique related is in my blood with all members of my family being keen collectors.
Some things are just indispensable...
Even if the mother couldn't see taking them out of school as an option, she could have done so much more for those girls than give them rules and try to make them comply. The girls sure saw not going to school as an option, and the very fact that their mother couldn't recognize that, shows a significant lack of understanding and communication on her part. I doubt very much that school or no school was the answer. Ditching school was more of a symptom of a larger problem, a problem that was created by the parents, their divorce, their move, their total lack of control over anything that was happening in their lives. School was just one more thing controlling them.
Oh well. I'm not pastcaring for nothing.You won't get me singing the blues!
Once I initially freaked out and calmed down. I decided to put sticky notes on my students desk so they could track their learning using their scales each time the learning goal was said and they showed their understanding on their learning scale. It sounds like a lot to do but my kids had already been showing me their understanding by using their fingers 4-I can teach a friend 3-I understand 2-I understand most of it but need more help and 1-I'm trying but I don't understand yet. So all they had to do was write this down on the sticky note during the beginning, middle, and end of the lesson. It worked out well (thank goodness, I must have a teacher guardian angel) and the lesson ran smoothly. My students enjoyed working together in cooperative groups and making the foldable. My students behaved and did a wonderful job with the lesson. My principal loved how I had differentiate activities for all types of learners. Yeah, go me! She gave me a high five on the way out and said great job. Seconds later I got an e-mail already from iObservation telling me what I got on my observation which was applying.
That’s it for the wreath!
(A 100-page True Crime Short with photographs) Clint Eastwood’s movie and the book from which it was made — Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil — put the grand historic city of Savannah on the map. Tourists flocked to see the gorgeous mansion where flamboyant designer and antiques dealer Jim Williams, played by Kevin Spacey, killed his young gay lover, played by Jude Law. While the movie portrayed the natives of Savannah as remarkably decadent, exotic characters, it missed the amazing dark side of Jim Williams himself.
05 - Apollo Medley
Is he good at his job?
NEED to know? Ack!!!
Robocop
"Yes" I tell him. "That would be great."
Render bacon, remove strips. Add onion and celery to bacon grease, cook until softened. Add flour, cook while stirring for 2 minutes. Add chicken stock, bring to a boil, then turn down heat and cook until thickened, stirring constantly. Add half and half and peanut butter, continue to heat, do not allow to boil. Serve immediately, garnish with bacon strips, red pepper flakes and a dollop of strawberry jelly.
Former UFC Welterweight Champion Matt Serra, who grew up in East Meadow, and MMA fighter Eddie “Truck” Gordon of Freeport are among the athletes who have put their strength, and support, behind the inaugural launch of County Executive Edward P. Mangano’s Brick 26 Challenge.
AND THAT’S WHEN THE PYRATE REALISED THAT I WAS TOOOOOO QUIET …..and came to investigate.
Use circles.
I love you Jillian Bea.
4. Tag someone else.
My immediate family took a trip to Gatlinburg this month as well. It was so nice to be able to get away for a long weekend. We all had a great time and can't wait to get another trip in soon. This was our first weekend away since Max's transplant- it was long overdo. During this trip we were able to meet up with 3 of our transplant buddies. It was one of the coolest experiences of my life watching these four little miracles running around and playing with each other. I had met all but one of the families before this weekend, but you would've never known that we all just met less than a year ago. Something just felt right about being with this group of people. You didn't have to explain anything to anyone- they just knew. They don't judge if your child is behind the other kids his/her age- they celebrate the progress that each individual has made. We talked about gtubes, granulation tissue, PD catheters, eating/drinking issues, therapy sessions, dialysis, medications, labs and feeding pumps and no one had to ask what the other person was talking about. No one looked at you like you had three heads when you asked a question about something kidney and/or bladder related, because they all knew exactly what we had been through and will continue to go through for the rest of our lives. These are our people and it felt oh so good to be able to communicate with them face to face about every day challenges without feeling like we are the "odd" ones. I can 't wait to hang out with these wonderful families again and to see the milestones that each of our kids have made in the time that we will be apart. Those few hours that we were together was another one of those moments that I will never forget.
The Professor: *plants air-kisses on each side of my face*
My wife's grandfather used to make his own whiskey in Louisiana and last year her family gave me his old still. Of course this still did not come with instructions and needed a little retrofitting to make it work, but finally we distilled some water for a test run and everything went well. I was given his old recipes to make whiskey and he must have made a good spirit as there was a letter from Early Times, which he had sent in a sample. I will try to post the letter later but they said he made a good whiskey.
For my card I decided to use the color aqua and paired it with white. The scripture that I used on my card is one of my favorites and comes from the Scripture Col. 7. The tag was created using the Daffodil Tag set. The layout for the card is from this week's Mojo Monday sketch challenge. I used a new Sizzix/Stampin Up! die that I recently purchased. I have to admit that when I first used the die things weren't working quite right with the die and I was ready to return it to my SU! demo. Once I used the cutting platform that came with my Big Shot the die worked perfectly!
the tallest juniper adorned
Third Doctor Season 8
Genhiz Khan initially came to power by uniting many of the nomadic tribes of northeast Asia, (whether they wanted to be united, or not.) He started the Mongol invasions and raids of the Kara-Khitan Khanate, Caucasus, Khwarezmid Empire, Western Xia and Jin dynasties. By the end of his life, the Mongol Empire occupied a substantial portion of Central Asia and China. At its greatest extent it stretched from the Danube to the Sea of Japan (or East Sea) and from the Arctic to Camboja, covering 22 percent of the Earth's total land area, and held sway over a population of over 100 million people.
4) Light Soya sauce – 3 table spoon
Indonesian authorities have detained the boat MV Alicia at Tanjung Pinang, where the 87 asylum seekers on board have refused to leave the ship. They had told the BBC’s Tamil service that they lived in Malaysia for two years before attempting to sail to New Zealand.
5. Spoon the cheesecake filling on top of the biscuit base and smooth with a spatula. Put it in the fridge for 3 hours or overnight.
For students of the business world, which many football fans have become in recent times, there is an interesting comparison to be made between the recent administration processes of two companies: Rangers and computer games retailer Game.
2.pro liar
Ink - black, pink pigment
Ve
And I say from the back, I don't know.
I'm not sure how to change my url or if that will affect whether or not my followers will be able to see my posts in their readers, but once I figure it out I will be changing it.
combine the cornstarch and the remaining 1/4 cup of milk
A tempest in the chamber pot, but one the GOP seems hell-bent on pressing while ignoring all the other weirdness going on.
Manuscript preparation is a chore I detest, so much in fact that tonight, in lieu of getting to work on it, I sat down and paid bills. If I don't watch out I'll soon have a sparkling oven and tidy closets. God help me if I start on the garage — it'll be taps for my future in poetry.
Sometimes when I sit at my desk to write, I put my glass of water on the ledge next to the open window. When I pick up the glass to take a sip, maybe fifteen or twenty minutes later, there are oftentimes tiny pieces of grayish soot floating around in it. Then I remember Paris is a huge polluted hellhole and run to close all the windows. The kids are forced to stay indoors for the rest of the day and must breathe through respirators attached to their heads with giant rubber bands.
I did almost give her a false phone number. But. If I was going to have a stroke from rising blood pressure
THAT………. I have to earn. Chase you? No………earn your trust? Yes. But I can only earn it if you’re willing to let me. Am I a threat to your comfort zone? I better be…..
One of the worries I have about my editing is how it affects my own creative writing. An editor by definition must internalize and work with standardized language. As a creative writer, I need to get outside such standards, to develop some unique ways of manipulating and forming words and sentences. If the role of editor gets too deeply embedded in me, I will not be able to think and create outside of its narrow confines.
Our frequent travels through China with two young children not only allow us to create family memories that we will cherish for a lifetime, but also allow us to bridge a cultural gap that we may not otherwise be able to cross. We have already hinted a bit about the attention that our little blonde-haired, blue-eyed beauties attract here. However, with the attention comes something that is just as foreign as the crowds that gather to admire them. Something I like to call ‘acquisitions’.
Hid kits are commonly confused by having bulbs that are labeled as Xenon front lights bulbs. In fact, in some situations, the bulb glass on these mediocre products is shaded blue to make their lights seem to be different. However, they generate the exact same or less lighting than a basic vehicle halogen bulb set.
One of the investigators suffered a bullet graze to his leg during the shootout and was treated at a hospital and released, Hood’s office said.
MS: Wayne Balmer wrote the score.
In terms of plot, the book is well executed. Amy and J. C. hunt for the murderer and make some interesting discoveries along the way. When I found out who the killer was, I had a kind of duh moment but it didn’t detract from my enjoyment of the novel. I was interested in knowing how J. C. and Amy would trap the killer and how the killer managed to evade detection for so long. In some ways, the story’s evolution and world reminded me of Christine Feehan’s Ghostwalkers series or Jayne Castle’s novels (which is a compliment to my mind), though there are enough differences that the comparison was fleeting.
When we add to that: the pure hypocrisy that the same Party that denies it, is trying to stop birth control while they promote lies against Planned Parenthood, who takes care of the health issues of both the working poor and single Moms, and Mitt Romney has said,”Planned Parenthood, I will get rid of that”;The Star of the Conservative right and Tea Party,Rick Santorum, who in 2005 and again while campaigning, long before they yelled “Religious rights,” said,”he believed all the States should have the right to ban birth control regardless because it is just Plain wrong,” and still the Republicans deny their efforts to ban birth control.
Amount Requested $16,000
Entertainment Bar
one other thing happened that made me know she knew exactly who i was...she told me she remembered my family. when we would go to the brain doctor we'd practice memory games...she'd name my coconut krewe and who they were married or engaged to. and then the puppies, ghostface killah and moxie. then she'd name her other grandchildren.
and I forgot what it said!
I’d definitely be a cat. They have an inscrutable and ineffable knowing about them. I’d love to know what they know!
With the front wing stalled, some of the energy it robs the airflow can pass towards the underfloor, increasing the pressure at its leading edge, forcing more flow under the floor for more downforce. With more downforce from the underbody, a smaller rear wing can be raced, which also creates less drag for more top speed.
It may be done to relieve symptoms without the need for complex diagnosis. Chinese massage is commonly used to treat back strain, pulled muscles, tendinitis, sciatica, rheumatism, arthritis, sprains, and similar ailments.
Make brownie mix per package directions. Dip 24 Oreos into the brownie batter until coated completely. Place one in each greased muffin cup. If you have leftover batter, divide it evenly among the muffin cups.
performance. Just make sure to have a small meal so you don't
My Feiance' Came home yesterday and with out warning says to me, " I think we should set a Date" I know I haven't touched on this subject much and most of you that don't know us well may think we are already married. But we are in fact engaged and have been now for 5 years. We have been a couple for 7 years. It was a very big surprise that he would drop a bomb on me like this out of the blue. I do not want an actual wedding. I think spending ungodly amounts of money for shiny stuff that no one will even notice or care about and a dress I will wear once, is ridicules. I think I want to go to a justice of the peace and have it done legally and do a celebration just he and I over a dinner out. Kids can baby sit the Twins for 2 hours. We have spoken with the kids, and they understand and don't care about having a wedding either. This isn't either of our first marriages, I just don't see a reason to make a big deal out of something like this. We live our lives every day very loved and Blessed.. why is it necessary to make one day more joyful than the next? We celebrate everyday by showing love to one another with out going broke or needing a loan. I have a beautiful ring and he will too and a piece of paper that will bind us legally. Anyway... I'm thinking of making the date July 4th. easy for him to remember, and if we are ever at a time in our lives that we are not financially able to celebrate, we have all of America celebrating around us, we can participate free.. lol Sounds bad doesn't it? I think it sounds realistic.. Not a fairy tale futuristic thought that I may not make true.
The way social media is helping us connect is awesome. Whether it strengthens bonds or helps us form weak bonds, it doesn’t really matter. The point is, it is helping ideas get shared, it is helping people get organized, and is providing ways for information to be shared and gathered at a viciously fast pace. A writer from social media today went into great detail, and provided very good commentary about this very argument. They posed that Dunbar’s number, when it comes to social media, is irrelevant because social media is more about having a network than for building strong social relationships.
In Copenhagen, one of the large indoor-style shopping centres has bike lanes from the nearby arterial road through the internal road system to the indoor bike parking area located right adjacent to the main front entrance to the shopping complex. In Calgary, major big-box shopping areas are connected to the bike trails along the river system and from the C-Train rapid transit stations by bike paths on road right-of-ways providing relaxing and pleasant cycling to stores. Such a network allows for comfortable and pleasant shopping 15, 20, or even 30 kilometres from home.
The renewals of the other two TV distribution agreements cover a total of 26 million ShopNBC homes. These agreements were effective in January and will improve ShopNBC’s channel positioning in more than 20 percent of the homes served by these two distributors.
He says NO word about the political and legal responsibilities of his own government and its predecessors.
Of course I've been sending my new books to agents, and have been accepted by one. Thank you god. I got the local newspaper editor to edit my book, and he did a great job, a better job than the New York editor who edited my first book.
Well, I've had no mail in about two weeks now and I'm feeling...empty. I need a full mailbox, dammit!
Mr Assadourian added: “Until we recognise that our environmental problems, from climate change to deforestation to species loss, are driven by unsustainable habits, we will not be able to solve the ecological crises that threaten to wash over civilisation.
They will skim along like salmon - you can see their shoulders gleam,
You: Hmmm.......
I am VERY excited about this, clearly. It represents a very big milestone, a massive success, a real sense of sticking to my goals.
Q: ‘Herbivore’ man’ is really popular in Japan, what kind of man do you think you are?
Isn’t the essence of heroism the willingness to make impossible choices? And then pay the price?
- a Btssb cutsew
Brazil’s President Dilma Rousseff Monday said interest rates on loans in Brazil are still too high, keeping up the pressure on private-sector banks to lower rates further.
Sam's palms began to sweat again. Her dad never talked like this. He was always so gentle and kind. Even when their teenage neighbors back in Salem had sideswiped his car, he'd been calm. And he'd never yelled at her or Abby in their whole lives, no matter how bad they were.
All of this as I have said is no defense of apartheid but an indictment of the world's unashamed hypocrisy that shows no sign of abating. One white farmer per week is being murdered in South Africa today (often in the greatest brutality), making it the most dangerous job under heaven on the planet since the end of apartheid. Western governments and its news media for the most part deliberately turn a blind eye to the killing fields. A Flemish lobby group in Brussels is doing its utmost to force this slowly growing genocide of white South Africans onto the European Parliament's radar asking a solemn question: "Hoeveel moeten er sterven voordat u de stilte breekt?" (How many must die before you will break the silence?)
362 **4. “How to Read a Platonic Dialogue.” Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, July 17, 2003, p. 8, July 24, 2002, p. 8. (Source: Item D-III/2/2001, below.)
This may be the first in an occasional series of direct quotes (varying greatly in content) from peer-reviewed papers or scholarly books reporting or reviewing autism research. Sometimes a paraphrase just doesn't do it.
Each of the offers will give you the option to choose No/Not Interested/Not Applicable/I don’t know as your response and by saying no, you’re not losing your chance to win!
10. No. 10 In G Minor 2:15
The anti-police agenda of the Macpherson Report is evident in the scandalous treatment of police officers, who, to Macpherson’s fury, resisted his attempts uncritically to accept that this was a racially-motivated crime. Questioned whether this was racially-motivated murder, Detective Sergeant Davidson made the following case:
1 glowered
underscored the need for
Oh, and check this out. The reason for Dogu-Chan's ample breasts, every time a yōkai is defeated it's energy is broken down and stored there.
leaders are warning of the coming revolution. While a year or two ago people rejected all warnings of a revolution, suddenly now it is accepted as a reality, but its too late, because they should have listened decades ago. Today these journalists get angry when they are told "We told you so", but the truth is that we did tell them so, decades ago already. Thanks to these very journalists innocent South Africans are today threatened with extinction. White are being murdered like flies, while the churches, the media and the opposition parties are keeping quiet about it, for fear of losing foreign investors and foreign visitors. We are expected to surrender our lives, our women and children for foreign investors and for the sake of being able to compete
When purged by fire and sword,
The Narrin, however, have a technology to enforce loyalty. This bit is a riff on a Aleister Reynolds and his “loyalty shunts”: they can keep you from speaking subversively, literally prevent the words from coming out of your mouth. Other words will come out. Not necessarily words that make sense, so in a way this is how you communicate displeasure or disharmony with the alien masters. It’s not a cognitive enforcement–you don’t have to believe what they say–you just have to act in a way that is in line with what the Masters want. You have to. Probably you’ll end up in a kind of epileptic fit or do a robot walk away from an attempt at any actual disloyal act.
ALL eclipses intensify energy. So whatever is happening in your life will feel much bigger. It is easy to become overwhelmed in the face of Bigness. This is a significant turning point in your life, in the world and the end of a cycle started roughly two weeks ago at the new moon. Looking at this chart as a mandala, what pops into my head is this:
In love and gratitude, Sarah B
Now, that's what I'm talking about!
By the time I was finished I was sweating; I flushed the toilet, quickly looking away. I refused to acknowledge the bright red streaks of blood in my vomit, which meant my esophagus was bleeding again. I’m afraid I’m crossing from bulimia into the threshold of anorexia. I’ll do whatever I can to lose weight.
“Think Danni. What’s the point of it? You’re right. Not everyone ends up here. Why?”
69 1755.10 N , 16 02 32.32
~Dennis
Real Red 1cm Taffeta Ribbon
I have also been watching her udder expand. Many resources I have read swear by a visual ”milk test” to predict labor, while others say NEVER milk them. I figured it certainly couldn’t hurt anything, so I did the milk test. Here is a great website about a horse milk test to predict a mare going into labor: http://yellowhouseranch.com/foaling.htm This website was really what I started following in the last few days. HOWEVER, I have now learned that the donkey (at least mine) does not produce the amber color described here. The udder builds similiarly, then, about a week ago, I was able to squirt a VERY sticky clear water. 3 days ago, it was still clear, but more of it and less sticky. 2 days ago, it squirted in a very nice stream, but still clear. Yesterday morning, it took on a cloudy appearance. By the afternoon, she had wax on the end of both teats. Sorry, I didn’t get a pic of the milk, just the full udder and wax yesterday.
Radiohead Creep UK
Here’s what the pin looks like:
Every introvert should read Quiet to gain greater understanding of themselves and what they have to offer to society. Every extrovert should read Quiet to gain greater understanding of the powerfully quiet people in their lives, and how a lack of understanding can cause deep pain.
After writing the only pooku, I showed it to the people around me. Unfortunately, not only were they not disgusted, but they proceeded to break rule 3) and wrote several more pooku, much better than the original, which just goes to show how neglectful people are of poetic traditions these days.
Me: Except you know, decongest.
618 D-X/23/1971. “Attica, Hiroshima & Nagasaki: On the Responsible Use of Superior Power.” Parents’ Weekend Program, Rosary College, River Forest, Illinois. See Item D-VII/7/1991, below.
The lad, surely, might have found real women?
2.towards the unknown
Article 127
Andrew Atkinson drums
I want this single.
As per the ET report, the importers argued that the products were genuine Dell products and that they had a right to import such goods under the provisions of Section 30 of the Trade Marks Act, 1999. Readers may remember the highly controversial Samsung judgment of the Delhi High Court which interpreted Section 30(3) of the Trade Marks Act to specifically prohibit the parallel imports on the grounds that the same amounted to trademark infringement in India. Arun Mohan had covered this case in a guest post over here.
Earlier today, the space shuttle Discovery made its way from Florida, flying up the East Coast and over the monuments of Washington, D.C. on its way to its final home at the Smithsonian Institution. The shuttle, always a breathtaking sight, was no less so atop the modified 747 that took it to Washington. The magnificent craft drew thousands of onlookers on its last journey.
What do these beers have in common? They were all poured at the Gents holiday party. All the regular Gents were there including Original Gent, Weston, all the way from his new outpost of China. We also welcomed Mrs. JJSKCK, Chambord and Mrs. Yeti to the mix. We were also joined by my friend Lee from I Love Beer and his wife Margaret. They were up from Austin for Christmas and were able to peel away from the family for an evening. We partied it up in The Foundry's upstairs party room which is like a cool retro beer lover's basement. It was the perfect room for our get together which was just going to be a beer drinking fiesta. Everyone was to bring whatever they wanted and we got quite the variety of beers.
And this was my comment on the thread itself. Fortunately, as a blog administrator, I get the last word:
And if you love him
That with you, I wish to spend most of my days
He stood on a line in a chicken factory and spent his days pulling the feathers off dead chickens so the rest of us wouldn't have to.
With so much going on in my life (not now, but come next Monday when school starts!) I needed a place where I could sit down and focus and be able to put up my goals in a place where I could see them. Yes, I could sit at the diningroom table, bu it's just not the same.
I look on helplessly with love and jealousy in my heart
Timeless Treasure Crosshatch in Aqua
Remember keep going for more heartaches, and finding pleasure in pain?
I am not writing this post just as a praise for her but also as a testimonial of a patient who got completely cured. I want that all those looking out for health solutions of any kind should contact her and experience what I did.
So here's some of the latest and greatest. Sadie is in all her glory. There are tons of visitors doting on her every day. Packages arrive daily and she gets to open them just like Christmas presents. Her mom and dad are home much more of the time than they used to be. Clearly something has changed around here but only for the better. And let's not forget TonTon (the affectionate French term for uncle) who arrived on Friday. The love affair that began at Christmas immediately resumed. Sadie is so enamored with her Uncle Joel, Nathan's brother. She flirts with him. She likes to just be next to him. She constantly monitors his movements and is aware of his physical location at all times. When I needed to lure her out of the tub the other night I said, "Do you want to see TonTon?" and immediately her eyes lit up and her arms flew up into the standard pick me up position. It is so sweet to watch. Here are some recent photos of Sadie in the gorgeous Easter poncho Tania and Brooke sent her.
Arab News
Maybe I've seen too many Agatha Christie episodes on TV, but this straw hat conjures up images of balmy climes and gentlemen in light-colored linen suits. But fortunately, I'm no gentleman. That relaxes the linen suit requirement. My Panama tops everything off!
On the other hand, some of the worst decisions of my life have resulted from the same lack of deliberative power, too—moving halfway across country without securing a job first in order to be with HIM (and not really getting to know HIM first, either). You’d think I would have figured that one out before seventeen years had passed on the basis of the Massachusetts Blizzard of ’78. It should have given me some clarity about my desire to live in a place where I would not have to shovel snow. Irrespective of HIM. The blizzard happened four months after my disastrous move.
Hello fellow authors!
You should have no secret pains because I can see all
But he tells well. He does it artfully.
I guess, yes, that’s what I’m going to do.
As we walked through the hall to get to their living area, I saw something I hadn’t seen in the weeks we’d been going to Rikers. There were lines of some of the young men posted up on the walls in a frisk position, hands up high on the walls with their backs facing us as we walked by. Correctional officers standing right by them. And honestly, this sight brought instant tears. When I say instant, I really do mean instant. It’s not like I haven’t seen people in frisk positions before, but just seeing all these youth lined up like that just hit me hard. Real hard. I tried to keep the tears from falling and it worked pretty well except the tear or two that betrayed me and fought hard to be free from my eyes. I tried to sort of turn my face so no one else in my group could see the pain on my face. But I met eyes with someone in my group and for a moment I wondered if she could read my thoughts. I wondered if anyone else in my group was as bothered as I was as the sight of seeing these young men posted up on the walls like this.
Thanks to everyone who Shops Their Stash each week along with us! There is still time to join in the Anything with a B Challenge going on now!
“Life has a cruel streak beneath the smiling facade and though miracles happen, more often than not, they are a prelude to God’s sinister plans for you.”
Tons of love, your wifey B
Adelaide spent some time in discovering what the origins of the voice could have been. She talked with counselors and therapists. She decided that a prescription for valium was not the way she wanted to go and decided to look for nontraditional explanations. It was one year after her son’s accident when she had her first gathering of a few friends to converse with her about the voices and their origin.
Injunction one: A BBC radio and television presenter who is a household name in Northern Ireland. He apparently does not want his visits to Gay brothels in Manchester and penchant for "rent boys" put into the public domain. It's ironic as he has no problem carrying out character assassinations on other unfortunates!
26So we said, Let us now make an altar for ourselves, not for burned offerings or for the offerings of beasts:
3- If you found out the tart gains a good color but not yet cooked from the inside you can cover it with a foil piece (the matt side).
Howard Pearson (Con) 234
“Would I want to see it again?”
It’s probably hard to tell in this photo, but the painting is approximately 2′x4′ acrylic on canvas. Now the only question is “Where to hang it?” But I’ll take that one over “When will she finish it?” any day!
I went out with some friends this weekend and shortly before meeting up with the gang, I was told some shocking news. One of the couples that I have known for quite some time, have separated. I was shocked and not surprised. If that makes any sense.
The Union are shaping up to be one of the better defensive teams in the league, but they will need more moments of attacking brilliance from Farfan if they want to win games.
Perhaps things will be improved before the expansion launches. One can hope.
Dania Suarez, 24, spoke in an exclusive interview to W Radio in Colombia, and told listeners in Spanish that one of the agents, identified as Arthur Huntington, was ‘heavily intoxicated.’
So we had the “aghast at too many books” moment followed by the “grumbling about space on the bookshelf” moment. Cheery Kenton’s okay, though. Some of the boxes weren’t books after all! They were comics and magazines after all. Ho ho! Kenton’s a regular guy after all! Grrr!
- The clouds vanished yesterday revealing glorious blue skies and perfect weather for a walk in the magnificently restored Greenhead Park, Huddersfield;
Jesus Christ!
Over the past seven years, 20 429 firearms were reported lost despite 12 control measures put in place. To date, the SAPS has recovered 4 810 of the guns and no steps have been taken against any officers.
# 2 – A green superfood masquerading as a common herb….
In "Part One" I showed you how to make the components for the "Swag" top treatment. Remember that only the parts are made at this point......not assembled.
I have never once called myself a Mommyblogger, not without a heavy dose of irony. I admit in fact to cringing when I hear myself described that way. I tend to say instead, "I have a parenting blog."
2010.09.19 Tajikistan Rasht 25 20 Islamists ambush and kill twenty-five Tajik troops along the border.
Artist: Bonnie Raitt
Some of that lovely location scenery in New Zealand.
There's a big difference between 16 and 4 points of view. The alternative is to NOT mention the number at all.
Don’t worry if you can’t relax at first. You may find that divine sleep may not feel too, well, divine. For me, it was a slow process of trusting and letting go. In fact, for the first two days, I felt like an egg sitting on the edge of a kitchen counter. My back ached. If I really let myself relax to the core, would I smash to the ground? And would I be able to clean up the mess afterward?
Gee, ya think? That never would have occurred to me — I operate dangerous power equipment around small children all the time and I’ve only had a few fatal accidents. (Well, actually, if the kids come out while I’m mowing my friend’s yard, I shut off the mower and take a break until their mom comes out, but that might be because I’m smarter than George Stephanopoulos.)
Basic Grey Indie Bloom Alphabet Sticker Sheet
3) Gaslight Anthem- American Slang
Sho in leather pants, Aiba smouldering, Nino his usual irritated self…perfect Ohno…
(E) You do not get any feedback from agents or publishers when you submit to them.
When the lights dimmed, a tall, trembling silhouette stood in a doorway to the East Room. The audience gathered there waited expectantly.
That was a lot of fun. This weeks words are:
As I’ve grown older, moved out of my parents house and became an adult of my own I have taken the time to strengthen my walk with God and gotten to know him. Last night I was reading the Bible and something that really stuck out to me was God discussing a mans disability. He makes it very clear that no one did anything wrong to cause that man to be born blind. Jesus says this happened so that the works of God could be displayed in him.
DOCTOR DOWN UNDER
First up, I have a card using the fabulous new Pure Innocence Home Sweet Home! LOVE her! I am a real estate paralegal so this is an AWESOME set to have on hand so I can make congratulations cards for my favorite clients!
I learned about the guy who circled the globe at the equator, crossing whatever terrain was in the way. How he sneaked from one hostile country to another, crossed mountains, deserts, learned to sail a small boat single-handed to cross the Atlantic and Pacific, and all to prove the limits of human endurance.
As far as the treadmill, I am pretty darned blessed to have that available to me. Also available to me in my current home is an elliptical. And in the summer, a pool. Although, I hope that I'll have found a job and moved out of my grandparents' house by then!
Main Street’s deserted
Well that's the first week of 2012 almost over, it's quite scary how quickly time flies past you ! The card I'm sharing with you today is testament to that as this is for my Brother-in-law's birthday, which is today, and it only seems like 2 minutes since I was making cards for his last birthday !
Cut off from family and friends, with little money, and even less knowledge of the worlds beyond his own, Craze heads into an uncertain future. Boarding the transport to Elstwhere, he vows to make his father regret this day.'
I also wanted to announce the So Artful Design Team! I am so thrilled these fabulous designers are going to be sharing their work with us! I have had so many personal/family issues lately that I haven't been able to be as involved as I would like, but this way you will be able to see some wonderful examples of responses to the prompts and have some feedback by comments too! Thanks to you all for bearing with me!
Summary: (from back of the book)
Long story short, War Horse has only had one serious boyfriend, he dumped her via text and she’s alright. In the end, she probably only had one boyfriend because on a scale of one to ten, who the fuck knows how to find Ocala, Florida?
I also got to eat, after almost a decade away, at the area's iconic crawfish joint, Hawk's, which is, as their t-shirts and ads proudly say, "in the middle of nowhere." It is indeed almost impossible to find, even with a Cajun in the car, and at one point we wound up driving into someone's (dry, fortunately) rice field. My friend Dickie laughed at me for sticking my camera into the food, but nine months later, I can click on the photo and remember how good those 'bugs were.
Teacher Appreciation is next week and it's a great opportunity to show some appreciation and thank those wonderful teachers who spend their days enriching the lives of our kids. I've rounded up a few of my favorite gifts we've given our teachers in the past and a few new ideas to inspire you.
Allow me to name names: In my market, Scion is an automotive brand very popular among the urban poor, particularly wannabe gang-bangers who can pimp their ride for less. Of course, this is not a desirable/prestigious demographic for the brand managers at Scion. They see themselves – and therefore project Scion – as a hip, counter-culture, forward thinking, neo-art brand. The result? Very cool ads and promotional events that do not resonate with Scions actual shoppers.
SEE YOU ON THE WATER!
See the redhead.
As we were leaving, I grabbed two bottle to take home.....famed Local 1 and Local 2. I have yet to try these but I've heard and read a lot of great reviews on them, so I'm very excited to get into them. If you're ever in Brooklyn, or NY for that matter, definitely take a trip to the brewery and check it out. You won't be disappointed!!
Probably the same as for any writer - dare, write, edit, refine, be persistent and be creative. And network too, apparently.
And it's a doozy!
Cleaning Kit
Adding a new page is almost identical to making a blog post. The difference is that it will be a stand-alone page that visitors can access from tabs at the top of your blog. Remember, you can always go in and change the page title if you need to change it...It does not require making a whole new page.
Boiled potato.
Granted the rest of the world is improving, but as I said previously I believe the problem lies more in our lack of improvement than in the rest of the world catching up. After all, we still have as much talent as ever. At the end of the 2010 season things looked to be going well. Tyson Gay had defeated Usain Bolt over 100 meters and ended the season undefeated, with the co-fastest time in the world, and ranked #1 in the world in the event. Gay (19.72) Combined with Walter Dix (19.72) and Wallace Spearmon (19.79) gave us three men under 19.80 over 200 meters. And Jeremy Wariner looked healed and ready to resume his role as one of the world’s best quarter milers after dropping times of 44.13 & 44.22.
It also removes the retroactive provisions of the original law, so old books are officially safe again!!! You can read the rest of the good news here.
So, what is happening when this doesn’t seem to be happening for you? It goes back to beliefs and your energetic vibration. Our beliefs can limit our abilities, even if they are subconscious. We take on beliefs in a variety of ways. Some are cultural. Some are environmental (the environment in which you grew up). Some are through experience. Some are misinterpretations of events and experiences. Some come through mass consciousness. Some you take on from media. The list goes on. But, does it really matter how you took them on? That depends. For our purpose here, it does not. It doesn’t even matter what the beliefs might be. Why? Because Creator can, if you are ready and willing to accept, change those for you instantaneously.
Community Development Department
On the past two Saturdays, though, they marched to other parts of the city, which led to tense standoffs with police. On September 24, about 100 people were arrested and the group put out video which showed some women being hit with pepper spray by a police official. On October 1, more than 700 people were arrested as the group attempted to cross the Brooklyn Bridge.
I have already started on one of the goals for home. To purge and put every nook and cranny in order. I still have many things to do but I am feeling so much better already. I love it when things are neat and orderly. I think that once I am done I will start all over and go through and purge again. Especially in the office/craft/catch all room and Megan's room.
I’ll be honest. I wanted to go up north (God’s country, of course)… But Pa wasn’t really part of that plan. Him being there limits me to going up there, looking at the apartment and heading right back home.
One vote per day, per IP address til Nov 6th...so use all your 'puters every day ;) I want to make it to the second round and I need THOUSANDS of votes to get into the top 20 (what in the heck are they people doing to get so many votes?) so I'm looking to go VIRAL!
At that point I didn’t know what I know now – that weight loss hardly ever works and that my experience was the same as almost everyone who tries to lose weight. But sill, I decided to try some of the other things that I had been putting off until I reached my ever elusive goal weight, maybe I could do them fat.
It just happened to be the right fit. The producer hired an award-winning screenwriter (I can't name the screenwriter yet) to co-write an adaptation with me. I'll be learning so much about screenwriting from working with him. My novella has not been published yet, and I am about to send it around to agents and publishers soon. I do need a good literary agent now, so that is my new goal -- finding a good fit. I never needed a literary agent before since I wrote only tiny stories.
One of the victims was identified as a Chinese blogger named Xuan studying for a masters degree in Sydney, who posted about the graphic attack on the microblogging site Sina Weibo.
Beautiful evening....beautiful sunset. Life is good.
Dad winds the old family clock. It was a wedding gift to my grandmother and grandfather, Dad's parents. I think. I believe Dad told me that his mom carried that clock in her lap from Oklahoma to California during the Dust Bowl years. It meant an awful lot to her. I remember it chiming in her home. I always thought it was the most fantastic thing.
How many other followers/readers do you suppose he has that are not even listed?
Weakland’s own lurid personal behavior while in office is a scandal of even greater proportions, and it should be noted that it was Benedict XVI who finally demanded Weakland’s resignation.
And if your donation is the largest you can take one of these magnificent Official Biggest Morning Tea Daffodil Cosies home with you.
How dare they insist that I clean up my room? Daddy Howard would provide a maid for my personal use. Maids are there to clean rooms. Not me. I was meant for bigger things. Daddy would let me finish high school at home and then he would groom me to take over one of his most important companies.
Members at New Life Church are not quick to question God’s authority, said one young worshiper. So when a gunman dawns on the church campus and causes the death of two teenage sisters before being shot down by a church security guard, the church isn’t angry or in despair and asking God “why?”
Two months later Polayya was paid out by his insurance company, which was just enough to settle his outstanding loan amount, leaving Polayya out of pocket.
If you had asked me ten years ago, upon graduation from high school, where I saw myself in ten years, my answer would have been definite. I would have said I’d be working with computers (don’t you love it when people give that broad spectrum?), and that I’d be married to my high school sweetheart, Frankie. At that point in my life those were the only two things on my mind: what I was going to do for work, and my boyfriend. And really, how much else is usually on the mind of an 18-year-old?
As a member of a species renowned for its flatulence, I trust you would have sympathy for one who faces ruin simply for performing this natural bodily function. In your wide experience of the activity, you must be intimately aware of its importance to good health and a comfortable bowel.
The plan of care devised by an occupational therapist will be exclusive to the SPD symptoms particularly displayed in your case. In Michaela's situation, her plan of care implemented all of the areas of treatment: proprioception, vestibular, auditory, with special attention to tactile, auditory, smelling and tasting activities. It was not uncommon for Michaela to touch something that was extremely hot or cold and it never registered. Imagine this for a moment...taking your child outside in winter and he/she is unable to tell you when his/her hands or feet are too cold. Imagine you are cooking in the kitchen and turn around to find your child has placed his/her hand on the stove without having a reaction. Our house had to be carefully monitored for potential dangers on a daily basis. I bordered on being neurotic, imagining the worst in any given situation.
Wolfgang Hampel shares some very interesting info of already mentioned Eva Vargas project.
Instead I am sitting on a train looking as though I’d been Tangoed. They promised me in the salon this would not happen. But it has happened and worse, there are two white panda circles where the crumpled bags under my eyes are, so it has highlighted those to great effect. The thing is, I felt good about my ageing face yesterday. Liked it even; appreciated that it was the face of a nice woman in her 40’s, not an orange woman looking like some terrible caricature of a lush. It has aged me 10 years.
So for now....
The website evidence submitted by the examining attorney
The Kitchen - Of all my nights out on the town in Colorado, the night we went all out at the Kitchen in Boulder was easily my favorite. I have had no dining experience that mixed the pleasures of beer and food more perfectly. The Kitchen is a fine dining restaurant that incorporates ingredients from local producers, features a large wine list AND large beer list AND has a knowledgeable staff that will capably pair either with your meal. Ray, the GM, took the time to hand pick a different beer to pair with each of our many courses and his selections blew us away. I can't say enough about the Kitchen, truly remarkable.
Olasonic Speakers: *2 Winners*
Softness settled into his gaze as he stared at me. “You are a poet, raven.” He teased, I knew, to turn the subject, but I would not be abashed.
me, "We don't have to wait another three years for the next
I’m really sorry, but even though this paper was published four years ago, it’s still under wraps, or so it says?!?! I’m not supposed to quote from it? Well, to hell with that. it’s important data, for keereissake!
So how did the official Heartland documents get out? Someone claiming to be a board member emailed an unsuspecting Heartland staffer, asking that a set of board documents be sent to a new email address. This act may have violated California and Illinois criminal statutes prohibiting false representation, and perhaps some federal statutes pertaining to wire fraud as well.
So and so did this, so and so did that … so and so did this with so and so … It is a wonder hockey can be played in the background and the panel on L’Anti Chambre are aware!
We make use of the Agile and SCRUM methodologies in development of our Ruby on Rails projects. With Ruby on Rails framework we develop dynamic applications like shopping portals, dynamic websites; AJAX & FLEX based UI Design, shopping carts etc. Our ROR development team practice with continuous integration with quality control for which we use CruiseControl tool.
Is Scent of Shadows a bad book? I don’t think so. There are a lot of good ideas here, including one great twist I never saw coming and thought was genius. Pettersson just hits Joanna with too much at once, without enough time for any of the revelations to really connect to the reader’s consciousness. There are enough major life events, changes, and thresholds crossed for three books in the first half of Scent of Shadows, and the compression is a problem of pacing. A little downtime here and there would help the book a lot. At least it would help keep me caught up in the story. The characters might be super human and able to absorb endless punishment, but as a reader, I’m not. I need the protagonist to catch her breath. Lesley, who recommended it, has good taste and assures me the series improves dramatically. The story has been compelling enough for Pettersson to put five of them out there, so I’m hoping to return to the story when I’m ready for more.
Our Gini Index has been computed by the HCP to 0.46 in 2009.The United States stand at 0.56; We have been catching faster in inequality, than we have been able to do in terms of output creation.
The Blind Side
What I am nervous about? How this belly is going to keep growing for 18ish more weeks...eek!
Anyone care to leave a counter-review?
3) Read one line at a time (try holding a ruler below each line as you read it).
The madness of the situation
But the human said, "Only twenty years? I'll hold on my twenty. Could you possibly give me the forty the cow gave back, the ten the monkey gave back, and the ten the dog gave back; that makes eighty, okay?"
Twisted Pine Brewing Company Billy's Chilies Beer (Timberline Series)
Put the top back on the food processor, and blend slowly for another minute to mix thoroughly if you added more salt.
SEWING WITH OILCLOTH celebrates true oilcloth, laminated cottons, and chalk cloth—easy-to-sew and fun-to-use specialty fabrics! Inside Kelly shares easy-to-follow instructions, special tips and tricks needed to get the most out of these fabrics, unique applications for each type, and advice on how to treat and care for the finished pieces. Among the 20 projects: a Chalkboard Table Runner (perfect for parties!), Seat Cushions, Party Banners (fun for outdoor summer celebrations!), Make Up Bags, a Farmers Market Tote, Lunch Bags (re-usable and so much cuter than anything you can buy!), Laminated Cotton Baby Bib, Mommy and Me Aprons, and more.
This summer I have mostly been working. Some time on some new vids but mostly on new games.
Once again my eyes rolled in my head “and don’t do that look” Keith sneered.. Still facing away from me. “How did you..” I went to venture, again I was cut off
Ubsy says he is not fazed by all the criticism. “I’ve got other things to worry about. Now that I look like Palin, I’m trying real hard to unlearn everything I know about civics and geopolitics and replace it with winks and snark.”
And that is my long-winded way of telling you that I'm still running even though I haven't talked about it in...oh let me check the labels on the sidebar...November 2011.
You would think that all that good breeding would have filled me with the genes to stride through life as a confident Germano-Celtic-Hoosier. But something always seemed missing. Somehow the knowledge that I was a G-C-H couldn’t seem to overcome the sense that I wasn’t complete. There just had to be more to me. One little, extra special ingredient that truly defined me to myself and the world.
And I don't know if this makes any sense at all, but it seems to happen around the same time that my lower back really starts to ache - again, at the end of the work day. I sit at a desk all day and that certainly seems to be creating back discomfort. I try to get up often but it doesn't seem to cure the problem.
I thought these Italian Chicken Wraps from Taste of Home sounded like a winner to me! Can't wait to enjoy them after an evening run around the lakes!
While this all sounds very playful and not entirely academic, let’s remember that playing IS the way young children learn best. Whether it’s enjoying a new culture through its music, traditions, and clothing at a playful luau, or watching a square bubble wand form circular bubbles no matter how they blow them (then asking why this continuously happens), playing is how children learn new things. In a way, playing is children’s form of work (think about how tired you are after a day’s work, and how tired our kids can be after a full day at preschool – both are mentally and physically taxing!).
“Denali” cards: supporting independence and courage…made for kids at school….but good for me, too.
New Orders Since end of day 01/31/2012, still outstanding as of end of day 02/29/2012
1 tbspoon oil
Not a bad start, but I've got some Avery and a few others. We're going to try and squeeze in a trip to Gingerman to run through the Anchors Christmas beers going back to 2005. Stay Tuned.
Saying what I want, falling from my London pavements, falling from my own fucking grace.
Through the violent weird art movie of Bronson I found this gem from New Jersey indie electronica outfit Glass Candy. They call it Italo disco, it’s sort of 1980s simplistic trip out techno that puts you in mind of Blondie and Kraftwerk. In other words awesome. Check it out.
FLYING DOG - Raging Bitch
So, to answer the question it is appropriate to ask twice.
why I make these choices.
“We’re disappointed that the Federal Government didn’t agree and sorry that families and children may suffer from their unwillingness to explore our proposal,” Bloomberg said.
1 bonhomie
Anyone who works, either mentally or manually, can adopt this method in all his relation. Nothing can hinder him from using it even inversely, that is, by applying it to the presence of God also of God in the souls of others. If, unfortunately, God is not present at all times in all men by grace, He is present in essence, as the creator and conserver of their being. Thus, a teacher can always consider God present also in his pupils; a doctor or a nurse, in their patients; a merchant, in their customers and so on. This thought will inspire in us sentiments of kindness, charity, and respect for all those with whom we come in contact; it will lead us to be interested in them and to serve them, neither for an advantage which we may reap by so doing, nor solely from a sentiment of duty, but as homage to God Whom we recognize as present also in them. It means, in short, to seek, serve, and love God present also in our brethren. Thus, we must look up to St. Joseph for our true model of an interior soul who desires to live totally for God and with God, in the accomplishment of the mission he received from Him.
a.) in the playoff hunt
The second objection is equally as obvious and equally as easy to defeat, “Look at what the Clinton tax increase did for the economy and the deficit.” Yes by all means lets do just that. The massive 1993 tax increase did increase revenue, but not nearly as much as the Democrats, CBO static models and such had predicted. Reports from the CBO, OMB, and IRS all agree – LINK. After the Republicans took over Congress, passed welfare reform, cut spending, set a path to a balanced budget and CUT TAXES on capital gains from 28% to 20%, instituted the child tax credit, cut taxes on inheritance and raised the ceiling for IRA’s the economy exploded and revenue pored in. Unfortunately at the end of Clinton’s term the capital gains tax cut expired because it had a sunset provision, Clinton pushed massive new fuel and energy regulations which sent fuel prices skyrocketing and the tech bubble burst causing a stock market crash.
and on a final note using this space to find a friend work.
How can you not be full of gratitude on a day like today? It’s beautiful outside, cool and crisp and sunny. The strong wind that whipped around the Valley every day for over a week has finally subsided. It will probably climb into the upper 60s later on. Yum.
In the event of a drawn game scores are calculated as normal; they will be 24 - Own losses + Enemy losses.
Alleged violence
Having touched on the unfortunate parental necessity that is losing on purpose I confess, unashamedly that I find it to be a grind. For a start there are only so many games of Connect 4 I’m willing to play like an idiot. Similarly with Top Trumps, overlooking Yoda’s unassailable points in the ‘Force’ column and offering up his paltry efforts in the field of ‘Battle Tech’ gets very tedious very quickly. And there are some games you just can’t lose at on purpose. Have you ever tried to throw a game of Pop-up Pirate? It’s impossible. And on rare occasion the need to win totally gets the better of me. After sportingly choosing Accrington Stanley or Yeovil or similar to pair off against my daughter’s selection of Inter Milan or Real Madrid on the Playstation, I’ll suddenly flip, shying away from our unspoken agreement for Daddy to even out the scores with a couple of ‘accidental’ own goals and I’ll thrash her 12-0. Each goal greeted with a ‘YEAH!’ slightly more raucous than the last until she finally explodes in a scene of astonishingly un-sportsman-like behaviour which leads to me later having to retrieve the Playstation controller from the lightshade.
Then, later on while I am doing school work, one of my daughter's friends begin to text me asking if my daughter can go hang out with her, promising me that she wouldn't allow my daughter to get into any trouble...AS IF! I couldn't help but laugh.
Following the diagram in the photo below, cut the remaining Wide Petals and Pointed Petals strips to make your flower buds. For these buds, you do not use a rolled quilling strip. Simply roll the petals and seal with Scor-Tape. Wrap a small piece of green crepe paper quilling strip around base of bud for the calyx. You can vary the size of the buds by having more or less petals.
While the "not so tropical" part was intentional, in the course of baking this recipe I had an unintended crumble fail. In the end, my dessert didn't bear a very close resemblance to the way I imagine this recipe was supposed to turn out.
i looked at the heron right in the eye and did not feel one single thing.
Tier 3 – Remaining Realism
The Syrian Arab Republic consists of administrative units; and the law states their number, boundaries, authorities and the extent to which they enjoy the status of a legal entity, financial and administrative independence.
I bought my house at the age of 21. Married at 23.
Cohen concluded, “We haven’t seen all of the evidence, haven’t examined all of the testimony; haven’t had the privilege of seeing the case unfold at trial the way it is supposed to.” In Cohen’s mind, we needed to have the “privilege” of a trial in the highest-profile case of prosecutorial misconduct in modern American history. This distorted vision of the justice system makes Cohen’s the worst of any op-ed column published on the case.
Nate Stupar was going to be high on teams’ undrafted free agents lists, so the Raiders made a good move snagging him in the last round. Stupar is an instinctive, intense backer with limited top-end speed. He will be a special teams contributor and offers more depth at linebacker.
Well mounted on his grey mare, Meg,
1 1/2 cups coarsely chopped fresh cranberries
In terms of ease of carry, battery life and long service, and the price is cheap, the computer is becoming a favorite among journalists. It weighed more than 2 kg with dimensions of 30 x 21.5 x 4.5 cm (12 "x 8.5" x 1.75 "). Also this laptop use by 8 KiB RAM is expandable to 24 KB, and a 3 MHz processor.
Reid: she’s right
Last week Thursday, I registered my son for Kindergarten. My son is still 5 months away from taking his first steps into his "big kid school," and I'm already annoyed. I am a teacher (12 years in public high schools and now 3 at a community college), and I fear I am going to be one of those parents who can't stop complaining, whose standards and expectations are high and who calls to complain every time those expectations are not met.
And they're blue and fireball-orange! They're just the thing for wading through slush anf freezing mud, stomping across the field where my leather boots would be sogged in no time at all.
Some film music from Italian crime films, little bit of mash-up art,
Everyone will find their own ways of cultivating resilience and its important to remember that we don’t acquire it and then tick it off the to do list. It’s a practice, a commitment to yourself. The more you continue to cultivate the stronger your ‘bounce factor’ will become. Think of it as your personal tool kit, or the sword at your side, ready to go to arms when adversity strikes.
660 West Freeway
PAUL NEWMAN/JOANNE WOODWARD (Mr. & Mrs. Bridge)
"Strangers in the Night" by Frank Sinatra
It doesn't matter if you are gluten free or not - these are worth a new pancake mix tradition!
I’m gonna be positive
Now, lets be honest, porridge has never been the sexiest or most exciting of foodstuffs.
At this point, you can just enjoy your salad without the lettuce, just with the mentioned ingredients.
I made a spring card - wishing for a really fun, fun, season. After all, it's much too short to have it any other way. I used my new Close to my Heart stamps and Art Philosophy cartridge. By the way, did you know, that during the month of March, if you sign up to be a consultant for Close to My Heart - you get the Art Philosophy Package FREE!!!! It's true! You can take a look at my website - Yes, I DID sign up! www.pattiross.ctmh.com If you already have the art philosophy cartridge, you can choose to get $100 credit instead! Can you imagine how much fun stuff you can get for $100!!!!
For a couple days, the “no-leavened bread” rule feels like a fun challenge; I pretend that I’m on some kind of gluten-free kick, and start perusing flourless recipes online.
Sen. Jody Amedee, Senate and Governmental Affairs chairman, told Peterson, “I’ll be glad to go to any meetings, like I have told you before, and try if it is more convenient.”
The whole analysis was pretty interesting and a lot of the things they mentioned were right on for me personally. I'm not sure how accurate this test is but I wasn't too surprised at the results. I know I am a more creative person than a logical one and I have a hard time dealing with math and other boring things. Which would explain why I am bored to tears working at a bank. How did I end up here? Lol!
After that I did not compete with her again for a long time because as it turned out, she was hurt as well. Her shoulder and back had taken quite a blow from the fall. She could not wear a saddle for a long time.
Canning is a very special place. Huge room with a square dancefloor, nice soundsystem, nice people and usually, nice DJs...
The Sudbury model was first unveiled in 1968 by Sudbury Valley School in west suburban Boston. Since then it’s spread to a few dozen schools (about two-thirds of them in North America), all based on two simple premises: first, that children are innately, powerfully curious, driven to understand and master the world around them; and second, that the best education recognizes and respects this basic truth, allowing all young people the freedom and responsibility to discover their individual paths.
Shantih shantih shantih
I‘ve been transformed, I started changing, letting go of some worldly things, worldly lifestyle. Reading, searching and learning is what I am doing and putting into practice what I have learnt.
Our son liked it, too.
School of Fear by Gitty Daneshvari (four unusual children are sent to a wacky school to get cured of their phobias) ****
John gestured to his small house.
Q3: Who is the mysterious miss P?
Is the baby going to die?
Who Came And Who Didn’t: The hustings was organised on a week’s notice, on Tuesday 1st May, in order to give as much notice as possible while not using up a candidate’s time on the last night before election day. Proper hustings etiquette would have been to contact all candidates before fixing the date, but sheer pressure of time made that really impossible.
The Supreme Court (SC) has affirmed its Nov. 22 ruling awarding Cojuangco-owned Hacienda Luisita to the sugar estate’s original 6,296 farm worker beneficiaries –the number of farm hands at the time of the approval of Luisita’s stock distribution plan (SDP) in 1989 — or their legitimate successors.
2. Backsplashes
The flower made from the Scotch foam tape backing actually came to me right when I thought I was out of ideas... I wanted to make a flower from something recycled, but I wasn't sure what I wanted...I poked through my recycling for a bit, and then gave up and sat at my crafting table to try to "think out" the problem...and my eyes settled on a little pile of the tape-backing trash that I used for my last project and never threw away! They were even cut in the perfect length!
Guinsoo: Sorry, master.
Lot 596
He asked the crowd: “Do you want to enter Dataran?” The crowd shouts back, “Yes”. And Azmin replied: “Dataran does not belong to DBKL.”
And in fairness I should be more alert when it comes to stickers and light bulbs, but come on now, this time when I was pulled over, I kid you NOT, the lady in the car next to me had a toddler jumping up and down in the back seat. Jumping, up and down, isn’t that far more dangerous?? Especially when there are people on the road who are obviously oblivious to their burnt out brake lights?
I'm pretty sure we all have a mat. It might be any wound or doubt or belief or unbelief that keeps us from walking. It might come from our own heart and mind or it might even be something someone else doesn't want us to forget.
there was another bleed around 11pm when she had another fit of coughing,
03-The Slickers-Nana
- Shelly
While the nation faced a leadership crisis during the sickness of late President Umar Yar’adua in 2009, Mr. Okah emerged a prominent figure in the aftermath of a successful amnesty programme for the Niger Delta militant, initiated by Mr. Yar’adua.
No, we don't really need you on the stage at all. We'd like you to press the 'play' button on the CD player for the backing tracks.
That seems crazy to me.. but when I think back to the few super bowl parties I have been to, they are rather indulgent and definitely full of junk food.
80. If we could shrink the earth’s population to a village of precisely 100 people, with all the existing human ratios remaining the same, there would be 57 Asians, 21 Europeans, 14 from the Americas and 8 Africans. Only 1 would own a computer.
In a large bowl, cream butter and sugar with a mixer on medium speed for about 1 minute.
"The history of the mimetic in the bourgeois novel can be written as the history of two tropes for property, that is, the love story of I and Mine: The Umbrella and The Camera. (The seamstress/sewing machine is important too.)
g) Photo Shoot for Chop Zuey Ad in Fashion Magazine (TBA) ***************
Rings on
Sean is doing pretty much the same. His breathing is the same or getting more shallow depending on the time of day. He struggles more at night it seems.
2) God has a surprisingly weak grasp of American geography, sending a blizzard that completely bypassed the Castro, West Hollywood and Boys' Town.
I would like to thank the MES for inviting me to Cairo, I had a wonderful time. And a big thank you to the teachers, all the other staff and the students for giving me such a warm welcome and for making my visit to Cairo so special.
SEA by Heidi Kling is a 2011 IRA Young Adult Choice and a Missouri Gateway Award Nominee.
This regime of terror, extending beyond the gates of the ANC/SACP ‘Buchenwald’ of Quadro, was a necessary element in the total practice of repression and deception which made the Anti-Apartheid Movement the most successful Popular Front lobby for Stalinism anywhere in the world.
Jennifer Douglas
Buy Crest 3D Whitestrips, get $10 ECB (Limit 2)
That's not exactly true. If a starlet has a meltdown, you can be sure to see a photo. And when Hillary Swank gets in hot water for being paid to wish a dictator happy birthday, EW will tell you all about it. But the reportage is brief and not the focus of the magazine. Entertainment Weekly is pop culture news for those who care about the product much more than the celebrity.
"What can be said about Sean Sutherland that hasn’t already been said? Well, since no one really knows who he is, you can say anything you want. All we really know is that he is from Michigan and graduated from Michigan State University, he knows how to Relate to the Public (ie. Public Relations), and from what we can tell from his outstanding contributions to the Agency Confessional, he knows how to spell.
15,902,122.07 thus losing a
Anyway, back to my story.
Even the Netherlands, a nation that embraces pluralism and tolerance, has opted to cut funding to the Gulen schools because of their imminent threat to the social order.
I've heard it said bad things happen in 3's but wouldn't you know it mine come in 4's! (not really bad things per say, let's just call them incidents) LOL
In the past, we have toured the area by bike between Banff and Lake Louise, as well as on the Canadian Continental Divide near Field, British Columbia. Within Lake Louise and Continental Divide, we have also cross-country skied and hiked at different times. (Winter avalanche warnings are real.) The first time was by car before we switched to self-propelled means.
Online Passes have been discussed in a previous article, but that doesn’t make them any less despicable. For those of you who are completely unaware of the trend, game publishers are punishing those who have purchased their games used by including an “online pass.” These passes can only be used once. Therefore, used game owners will need to purchase (for an additional $10) a pass in order to access online content.
One of the judges in the just concluded Nigerian Idol Season 2 Area Father (Charley Boy) who has announced publicly that he has changed his nick name from Charley boy to Charley man few years back.
We also did wide-angle downward facing dog. Donna said, The energy is in the back of the legs. Sure was. Prompted by Donna, I moved my hips to the right then to the left. How did Donna know that I needed wide-angle downward facing dog? Of course, we walked the dog and that felt good too.
Not only is it important to keep the characters' physical details straight, it's also important that the tone—the verbal quality—remain consistent. The characters need to think in the same way throughout the series (unless the plot dictates otherwise), to speak the same way, using the same expressions and catch phrases.
Q: Who are some of the people that inspired you and/or continue to inspire you to write--or as an athlete, perhaps other artists, athletes or people from your own life? On WWRW we like to hear about inspiring women in particular, but feel free to include guys too!
What we want to do now is search where we haven't searched before for Paul and Nita on Tafadzwa. So for that we need to raise as much as we possibly can!!
The yard has been keeping me very busy, so I went to the archives for this week’s post.
holds on her lap an enormous hoop;
That's fair and dear to the hearts of those that sail
Foster Wheeler AG, Alternative Energy, Deal Details 11
That's about as close as I can find given the time restrictions I have. Yes, it was during the day, the dream setting that is, although I was dreamin' at night.
only realized how horrible that is very recently. It just seemed like
I was pretty worried about making sushi for the first time. Fortunately: Lily has made sushi before, my aunt gifted Lily a sushi mat a few Christmases ago, and nori turns out to be far more durable than rice paper.
Yet the legal revolution of consciousness, the application argued in favour of was not only ecological, but additionally psychological, and corporate.
A big cheer goes up as the screen reads
It takes up our entire console and I just would really like a clever idea as to how to make it not the complete focal point of our living room...
For example when I go to the beach my favorite
4. Hurt Me
xxxxxxxxxxxx
What I call a slump, God calls refining. My slump is how He is going to prune the bad off of my branches. My change in Christ will not always be without pain. And it is not an automatic, complete change: it has it's ups and downs. My change is a process, and I can either stay caught up in this slump or I can call it part of the process: like Fermentation to make wine (thanks again Hilary for this metaphor).
Row, Row, Row your boat
My feet hurt and probably swelled up and turned pink the moment I slipped them out of my tennis shoes tonight. I just got home at 3:17 a.m. after working a middle of the night shift at work, getting the store ready for our April set. I did this last month, and the month before that as well.
2 large brioche buns, warmed and toasted (from Walton's)
Okay, time is up. I’m going for a quick jog. Olympic is around the corner.
Rumours: CONTAINS SPOILERS FOR THE FIRST BOOK!
After entering the OFF Program Lindsey was able to get OFF drugs and OFF the streets. Lindsey kept her vow to help those that were just like her.
Grape juice was added to the bucket:
I opted to be the official
4. Have you carefully studied the market for your book?
This movement of Nonadanga has brought to the forefront the demands related to the condition of schools, hospitals, and drinking water along with the general developmental needs of the entire Nonadanga region. Nonadanga’s movement has brought to the forefront the demands – of the slumdwellers, hawkers and small shop owners – for the right to livelihood and right to shelter of those evicted from the fringes of Kolkata. Nonadanga’s movement has challenged the much-touted plan of converting Kolkata to London; it has put a big question mark on the pro-poor image of the government of “Ma-Mati-Manush”.
I bought them at Hobby Lobby one day after Avery and Charlie completely freaked out over them. The boy gnome was quickly claimed by Charlie while the girl was scooped up by Avery. Charlie was totally confused and nooooot pleased about the "putting them in the garden" part. It was a real battle to get him to leave them outside.
There really exists a light at the end of all tunnels. We must be resilient and pioneering enough to claim, then find it. Lovely how this applies to any and every situation you may be in. I know it speaks volumes to me.
Me- "Oh good gosh, you kids are driving me crazy. Quit tattling on your little brother. Can you please just let him stay in there for a few more minutes so I can pick up in here"
Various emotions flicked across Aurelius’s face before settling on what could only be called bewilderment. “I’m a grandfather.”
We travelled through Vermont and on to Hanover, New Hampshire for the weekend.
The figure is excellent though as all the figures in this series were. It takes the simple 2D design of the South Park characters and flawlessly brings them into the 3rd dimension. They got the crazy hair right, the mis-buttoned shirt is there, what more do you need from a Tweak figure. It is a shame though that so few figures were produced in this line and Tweak had to take up one of the spots, I’d rather of had a Craig. Oh well. 5 out of 10.
YA:
HAAAA! That's hilarious. And again, you guys pay way too much attention to detail. However....
Thomas Ray was still at home in the late summer to early fall of 1864, for in the spring of 1865 James David Ray was born on April 30, 1865, just days after the surrender of General Robert E. Lee at Appomattox.
What are we known for? A patient, enduring, even sometimes exuberant love in the face of difficulty and opposition?
youth XL,
I have no hard evidence, only impressions, and my impression is that the line between the two is fading. I feel that the effect of the Eastern traditional teaching can be experienced by immersion into the fast food culture, into the unrelenting novelty of its forms, and into the good company of self-realized people where you may listen deeply to discussions, ask questions freely, and mingle with seekers, non-seekers, and realizers themselves until nonduality shifts permanently from the background to the foreground of your moment to moment perspective.
Add the shrimp, fish, tarragon,the zest and simmer for 7 to 10 minutes until the seafood and fish are cooked through.
here i did a two-tone page with coordinating paper
UPDATE: 10th January, 2012. The Irish Times has posted an audio clip here in which Sean Quinn, speaking outside the High Court in Belfast, gives his reaction to today’s judgment and after talking about what he claims to be the destruction of the Quinn group by Anglo, says that the group – presumably the Quinn group – will make a loss of €4bn in 2010-2012 and a further €4bn in 2013-2017, he invites journalists to contact him so that he can justify these calculations.
But I know
Spoils of War: ‘Free Fuel’
I find it a matter to despair that academic institutions, ostensibly a site in which we can resist some of the gravitational pull of market capitalism in at least a limited degree, are so shortsighted on these matters that it would be possible to have a classroom in a music building that doesn't even have a cd player, let alone a turntable (yes I'm talking to you, UMASS).
throw pillows
So, it just struck me that everyone in this world, i mean each one of us is like Amir Khan. We tend to remember stuff only for 15 minutes or at maximum 30 minutes. I mean when we open our Facebook accounts, we see so many inspirational and motivational things around us but that just remains in our mind till they are on the screen. “Out of sight, out of mind”.
12”x 12”x 4” 4th tier (holds 16 cupcakes)
I could hear the like-Spanish sounds, but again so many more levels
floors.
Dylan
Summers should be slow, languid and lazy, time taken out of days that once seemed so endless. A time of long grass and nudity and cooling waters flowing over your…
We can learn from the spirit of lake, be calm & peace irrelevant what types of anger or frustration we are facing in life.
I woke up late on Saturday morning and ventured out into the kitchen to grab something to eat. I was crashing at friend's place--the night before, I had stayed out late, partying with some friends. My friend was babysitting another friend's kids. I greeted them and made myself a toast and egg sandwich, listening to the kids talk excitedly about their finds from an early garage sale they went to this morning with my friend. The kids were showing off the clothes and shoes they had gotten a good deal on. The stuff was in pretty good condition. I couldn't help but smile at their eagerness and excitement, knowing that they made some great deals that morning, and I, too, was hoping to score some great merchandise later in the day when my friend and I would go shopping. I thought it was very nice of my friend to take the kids out to do some garage sale shopping, buying them stuff.
Stamps: Sweet Summer, Messages for Mom
During the month of April, I am participating in the Blogging From A-Z April 2012 Challenge, where we post everyday except for Sundays. I have decided to make flashcards for the letter of the day out of my photos, and then use the picture as a writing prompt. I am using my Thesaurus to make a story out of words beginning with the letter "W", and to have it make sense. I have no idea of the twists and turns that it will take, and usually crack myself up when I am all done. Hope these little ditties make
16 Dark Day - Nudes in the Forest
BG90: A new, beautiful pale, gray BG to go with the other BG90's colors
This is a photo I caught during last month'sFort Greene Festival titled "Kid Play In Ft Greene Park".The title doesnt expresswhat I thought was cool about the moment. I looked back to the food vendors (blue tents) and for a second because of how far off all the adults were it looked like the park had been taken over by mini-people, and to an extent, for the moment, it had. All of them busy with their own imagined industry. Good times.
Buff: Your social life has been the focus of news reporters for some time. Will you be able to tone down your night life once you're in a public office as highly visible as one in Washington D.C.?
4) Put both answers together in a post and come back here next Monday (3/26) to link up!
But He bids me go; thro' the voice of woe His voice to me is calling.
because in giving we are preparing to
Today is the last day of the blog hop and I truly hope everyone has had fun hopping with us! It was so much fun and we hate to have to end it but we must. We would like to Thank You for hoping with us!
HTC has officially released Rhyme in the Indian market today. Priced at INR 27,499 (MRP – 29,990), it has been available for a much lower price of INR 24,800 for quite some time. But, we believe that it going to change soon. All the major cellphone manufacturers are correcting their pricing to take the increasing load of poor rupee value and it has impacted the pricing pattern deeply.
The more I think about it, the more I’m sure it can’t fail. Given the shortage of Catholic priests, once the thing is up and running we might even be able to an official deal with the Church; after all, this concept would go a long way towards easing their manpower problems. I can also see possibilities for offering different apps for other religions. You could do diet checks for Jews and Muslims (hell, their dietary restrictions are so similar, you’d only have to write the software once). You use your smartphone to read the bar code on a product in a supermarket and the app tells you whether it’s kosher or halal or not. The Muslim Comfort option finds your location automatically per GPS, calculates sunrise and sunset for your position, reminds you when it’s time to pray and
should be attached VERY tightly – barely enough
The weekend was extra special as Uncle RyRy and Britt flew in from Seattle to officially meet little Miss Lillianne. Ryan arrived on Thursday morning, giving us a couple extra days of playtime with Cole at Mimi and Papaw’s house so Mom and Dad and little Miss could get settled without added commotion. Brittany then joined the party Saturday morning ~ allowing this Mom and Mimi to feel blessed beyond words to be surrounded by her entire family for a few days. It was a busy time – cooking, loving the babies, cooking again, loving all the babies some more, and cooking again. Sunday night came all too quickly as Tim and I headed back to PA in order to go back to work the following day. Reality always has a way of interrupting. The salve to help soothe the aching Mommy heart this time is our upcoming family vacation to Seattle in July!
So its the beginning of the New Year, and first of all Gisella and Garon would like to thank all of those beautiful souls who graced us with their presence and the several Art Salon's we held Last Year.
The top officials of Uttrakhand forest department sifted the dread tusker of Rishikesh to Rajaji National Park. For around two months, there was terror of the tusker in Rishikesh and had killed many people. In the presence of top executives of forest department the tusker was leaved in the chila range of Rajaji National Park.
+ Plenty of John to go around
Before it rips you in half
Most of the subjects covered were about customer service and safety for food service employees. Everyone sits through the same Orientation, no matter what your job is. I will be trained on the cash registers, so I guess that is why I had to sit through the information about customer service. There is always a possibility that I may have to fill in for someone in a different department. Not too much of a chance meeting with customers in the accounting department.
Look, I know you’ve got a voice and think you’re hot shit and everything, but please. Can you just shut up for, like, 5 minutes? I would just like to live one day of my life without you in it.
Be Good
I am now out of training at the french joint in the heart of Buckhead. The vests are turning out to not be the worst thing ever. The lack of pockets on my apron however is a real pain in the ass. The vest has plenty of pockets but since I am not built like barbie I have an abundance of room in the chestular area and not so much in the waist area. Any necessary things I may put in my inside vest pockets like washcloths, crumpled splenda packets, wine keys, cough drops and a watch well these just make me look like I have a small lumpy dog wrapped around my waist. The waist looks stuffed full while my chest fits like nothing has since I was a 13 year old flat chested girl. The uniform is the biggest cock block I've ever seen. Better than a grandmother for zapping your self esteem. The only other really weird part is having to carry a pager for the kitchen to reach you. I usually tuck this into the waist of my pants so I don't confuse it for the vibration of my cellphone. This usually works out well until the hostess gets happy with the buzzer while you're at a table. I nearly dropped a bottle of wine on my table this afternoon when it started to buzz as I bent over at the waist.
She may not be with us too much longer, but I'm going to treasure each and every day that she walks around in circles on the bed and wipes her face on me after she eats.
Update: The Sunday Times is a British newspaper. The item about Obama agitating for Israel’s return to the 1967 borders originated in the Times. Has this been reported in the US press? Recall, the first time we learned about George Hussein Onyango Obama, the president elect’s half-starving, half-brother, was from the British press. Is this the case with resepct to Obama’s direction with Israel? If the American press intends to abrogate its responsibility to report about this man, much as the same media neglected to report the truth about the invasion of Iraq—scouring the foreign news media will become a must.
Sam ran to meet her. "We're in." She threw her arms around her sister.
I am astounded at the clamour from the liberal chattering classes over the Home Secretary's eminently sensible proposals to force Internet Service Providers to afford police and security services untrammelled access to customers' e-mail and web browsing records. Don't these unprincipled scoundrels and enemies of the state realise that access of this sort is invaluable in combating crimes and moral turpitude such as tax avoidance, immorality and conspiracy to frighten the horses?
Friday, March 25 - Cedar Cultural Center - Minneapolis, MN
About 30 minutes before the women's 5K start time (the women and men run separately at this event) Kim headed off to her post and I started doing some warm-up jogging and stretching. Jason arrived about 5 minutes before the start and we talked strategy. Sadly, this race doesn't have many good intercept points for spectators so he only got to cheer for me at the start and the finish.
We are big DIY'ers. When you come through the front door to the left is our living room and to the right is a small sitting room(where you will usually find me blogging).
McKinney is charged in a cocaine conspiracy involving 20 kilograms of the drug, as well as a substantive drug possession charge and one count of receiving a bribe. If convicted, McKinney faces a mandatory minimum prison term of 10 years and a potential sentence of life imprisonment.
4. Air France - it feels good to be around you
Just after this nice surprise, some French people in the audience began to wish a happy birthday to David, who turned 60 just 10 days earlier, on March 6th. Then most of the audience sang the famous "Happy Birthday" song to David.
* Easily stores in gas or glove compartment
I’ve been thinking lately about the different kind of nurses out there. There seems to be the ones that love nursing for the patient interaction. They love helping people. They just really love people.
the clouds of darkness
This may surprise some of you, but I think I’ve come across another playoff proposal I could live with.
During the Christmas season I try to read as many Christmas books to the kids as I can squeeze in. It’s not possible to read every night, due to other holiday going-ons, but the kids take turns picking out which story they want to hear when we are snuggled in at home.
Me: Oh.. OH. *grabs book* Nothing... he's just playing a joke.
Welcome to the World, Baby Girl by Fannie Flagg. I love Fannie Flagg. Underground was partly inspired by Fried Green Tomatoes, in its use of double narrative and newspaper clippings. Welcome to the World, Baby Girl has a twist that no one I know who’s read it could see coming.
Haryana has certainly made its mark in this commonwealth games with a startling performance from the state. The most medals for it was won in wrestling with the likes of Phogat sisters leading the charge and sonepat for one has become a district of gold creators.
The post-symbolists’ issue with Stanford football’s suicide letter revolves around the idea of “Jungian-epic dualistic banality”, an idea they claim was first put forth by Belgian philosopher Ivan O. Godfroid in his seminal Psychiagenia: A Gauge Theory for the Mind-Brain Problem (Neuroquantology, 2003). In its letter Stanford football claims that something similar to Jungian-epic dualistic banality is the primary cause of the poor attendance, low enthusiasm and general apathy of a Palo Alto home crowd, though the letter calls the phenomenon “because we sucked for so long”-ism. Post-symbolists interpret the lack of an acknowledgement of Godfroid as borderline plagiarism.
so I am here on my first day of work and I have woken up at an incredibly early time. I am suited and booted but so so tired. I got to my hostel and went for a cheeky cigarette before bedtime. As I came in this Nigerian came out of a cab, having just landed in the UK for the first time. Now I generally hate being approached by people when i’m smoking, I have become quite an solitary smoker these days. Anywho, his very first line of questioning to me is
The closest you might be able to get is to visit Las Chinchillas National Reserve, a chinchilla sanctuary in Chile run by the Chilean National Forest Corporation (CONAF) (Spanish). Let’s Go Chile, Chilean tourist company, has a guide on their website.
Well, hopefully the winners will enjoy what I have in store for them... but yeah, you'll have to wait on that. :)
“Jah, there’s that–even though both mamms know better.” Emma’s expression sobered as she glanced at the women filing into the barn. “Ya don’t think somethin’ . . . dangerous or nasty happened to her, do ya?”
Most new artists stumble on one sound and are told to stick with it; Fiona clearly didn’t get that memo from her label execs. The MF Life is the sound of an artist who obviously shares a deep love for both her parents’ R&B record collection as well as her own contemporaries; for every bluesy vamp like “Bones” (the kind Amy Winehouse would have loved to have sunk her teeth into) or Stevie Wonder homage like “Watch Me Work,” there’s a sombre, sci-fi groove ala The Weeknd (“4 a.m.”) or a bombastic, ballsy pop song like “Change the Record,” which pits Fiona’s powerhouse vocals against the piano chords from Heart’s “Alone” and thunderous drums worthy of John Bonham. And then there are the big rock guitar solos on “Break Down These Walls” balanced by the ukulele reggae—don’t laugh,
A “prime borrower” is defined as one with a well-documented credit history, high credit scores, and a low debt-to-income ratio. The insight comes from the Federal Reserve’s quarterly survey of its member banks.
Come bedtime I'm going to tuck myself up in bed all warm and toasty and let it snow. I'll be reading Dickens by candle-light again. Bugger electricity.
I arrived in Kathmandu at the end of the monsoon season, October 1978. At that time the Nepalese government had made it possible for the first time to trek around the Annapurna Himal, a section of the Himalayas in north central Nepal and one of the eight highest peaks in the world. I’d always wanted to go somewhere where Europeans had not been and I knew there would be people there, particularly children, who would be seeing Europeans for the first time.
If you are thinking adoption might be the calling for your family, this book is for you. If you have struggled with the pain of infertility, this book is for you. If you have had just a fleeting thought of adopting and no issues with infertility, this book is for you.
I think I just saw a pig fly.....and was that a monkey that just flew out of that guy's butt?
HONING PARAGRAPHS
■Neighbor Kid #2
But one scientist in particular is now questioning that assumption.
MOST EXCITING NEW SERIES
and sigh the same.
11-23 Chicago, IL - Akoo Theatre
Primal Scream Rocks UK
I've been complaining for months, and people have been asking, so here's a few pictures of the snow piling up around the house.
http://butlersabroad.wordpress.com/ This Lady makes great cards! Very Talented & a very good Blog too! She always does the stamps justice & makes some beautiful cards!
21. J.L. Neve, A History of Christian Thought, vol. 1 (Philadelphia: Muhlenberg Press, 1946), pp. 24-25.
You will be so lonely, thinking only of yourself
May 7th.
She was very surprised and just loved her gift.
This was supposed to be ice cream. And it's not.
Never mistake knowledge for wisdom. One helps you make a living and the other helps you make a life.
ID Scanner – Things You Should Know Before Buying
What you don't need to do it keep the water in the bowl after cooking, as it states on the package.
“You didn’t tell me he lived!” I laughed as I ruffled the soft fur under his ears, mindful of the jagged line of stitches on his skull and across his shoulder.
If you play a simple song
Small spots of grass in different forms, e.g. triangles to emphasise the two triangles the square is made of, could be pushed together to create bigger patches of grass at times. I understand this would need hand watering instead of reticulation, but that should not be insurmountable. The same applies to more substantial modern furniture, that people should be able to move with the sun and shade, or when there are concerts or events in different parts of the square.
It’s gonna be hard to leave my family behind, but it won’t be forever. In the mean time, we’ll get to experience a whole new place, make all new friends, and live a completely new life.
In his stage wear, Elvis drew from Chinese, Aztec and Middle Eastern philosophies, donned karate inspired jumpsuits with Chinese dragons, Indian Tigers, Aztec sundials and all manner of viral and vibrant imagery from cultures across the globe and history.
Her hand looked like a glove of bones shaking at the end of her arm.
I'm sorry that I hurt you
there was no research, no deep thinking.
Too many humans .Well you see to promote a movie you need a star ,and Hollywood Producers care less about story ,and more about selling the movie ,and hence screen time for a star . Why Shia LaBeouf as the star , ask Steven Spielberg ,it was his choice not Bay’s
Ultimately, I’m extremely proud that I’m in a position where decisions like this one are even a possibility. None of this would be on the radar if I never lost the weight to begin with. I’ve lost 160 pounds, and kept it off for a year, and, in Dr. Grant’s words, I’m an “excellent candidate” for an abdominoplasty. Whether I get an operation or not, those are words that I won’t soon forget.
I do not really remember exactly when Carolina and I connected. I do remember that it was on Facebook and she liked some of the photos that I took of the murals and graffiti in the city. I looked at the photos of her art on Facebook and it really moved me. Her variation of shapes and the wide variety of colors has a calming effect on me.
Eprom – Regis Chillbin (Machinedrum Remix)
In a way, I like the weekends and in a way, I don’t. I do because Saturday is the only day of the week where we are not rudely awoken in the morning by the nurses at 7am! So, even though I don’t manage to sleep in for a long time, I just lay there relaxing with my eyes closed for a couple of hours usually until it’s 12pm and lunch time. I don’t like the weekends because there is nothing to do. I end up going stir crazy and pace the corridors. That’s me not in a good way.
-.Ireland 5
Just flat sucks.
♥ Paulette
Wendys
St. Paul, a man who I think was tormented by this same question of the limits of realism in different conceptual language (“the law” v. faith), and who sometimes unfortunately came down on the wrong side of the answer, as when he advised women to cover their heads and keep quiet, was in touch with his better self in Philippians 4. He made restitution with me, at least, with this advice that helped me reconcile the research about positive thinking with realism at long last, as the Bible fell open to this passage: “…whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things….”
Lachlan. He is missing his big brother on these days but is certainly 'lapping up' the extra attention from Mummy! He is also still having a good few hours sleep during the day at the moment - fingers crossed he keeps it up for a little while longer - he turns 2 this Sunday!
down its length;
and see the words
But you are handling the chemo,
M&M’s for color (optional)
So apart from authors I love, what else sways me? Let's look at three recent novels I have loved.
Flash-forward to the present and the searchers have returned with a perfect tree. We have set it up and decorated it with the help of a very enthusiastic four-year-old. All of the ornaments are hung in clumps,with gold spindles on one side of the tree and red on the other. It will take much head scratching and a beer or two to figure out how to rearrange the thing into a presentable tree without making it totally obvious that I've redone all her work.
Everytime, I hear this song (especially on my tough times), I easily break down to tears. A familiar song to almost everyone…
Perhaps the residents should also be given a little more factual information rather than what is perhaps nothing more than a hunch. A hunch that would perhaps give a voter a feeling of confidence and trust in the candidate and sway the ballot box in the appropriate direction.
I painted my fridge with chalkboard paint! It was kinda scary at first, I mean I PAINTED MY FRIDGE!! Everyone thought I was crazy, now I like to believe they are jealous of my super fun fridge. Dave thought I was crazy too, but he's used to that by now. ;-)
So how can I focus now on the realms that touch our core business – Sports & Tourism?
Additionally, the Mayor of Tshwane has launched an “administrative enquiry” into the matter and has extended Mr Jaca two weeks to respond to the matter.
Melissa Kirkendall Guest DJ Segment
- We post our challenges every Friday at 12:00pm AEST (AEDT during Daylight Savings).
And kicked me in the bollocks.
1 teaspoon ground ginger
d) I could break up with The Ex and thrive instead of simply survive.
Children who are adopted certainly don’t have a monopoly on anger as an emotion. It is quite common, though, for this group of children to manifest anger in ways that can appear excessive, confusing, and threatening. While most children will protest if they are bothered or angered by something they don’t like, it sometimes seems as if the anger expressed by adopted children is in excess of what we believe is called for at the time. This can include having an explosive outburst to seemingly minor things, such as not getting one’s way, a parent arriving late, a casual remark, or an innocent touch.
Have you ever noticed that ‘creative’ people are often disorganized, do a million things at once and yes, procrastinate endlessly? Well it seems that interruptions are not that terrible after all (see my previous post on Procrastination) and being excellent at focusing is not that useful when you’re being creative. A British scientist has shown that it is those very interruptions that give our mind the mental pause it needs to notice a stray thought or random insight and bring it to your attention.
* Drink?
"Man, I swear, if anybody can do it, you can."
Whoever says they have “no regrets” is lying. We all have things about our lives that we regret– what those who say they have “no regrets” actually mean that they are at peace with their regrets. Some day, you will be at peace with yours too. So don’t kick yourself for making mistakes, learn from them and do better.
Luckily there are trees
The story also involves an illicit love affair, Legos, a zombie pig, and of course a couple of car crashes. I hope you'll check it out.Learn more about the book and author at Nick Arvin's website and blog.
The greatest example loving and truthful cultural engagement is that of Jesus. Though Jesus said plenty about the future, he also said a lot that pertained to the present. During His 3 year earthly ministry He was always with people. He always knew what each person needed. Whether teaching, loving, rebuking or challenging, Jesus engaged the culture and its thinking with the truth of the gospel.
Have fun! 頑張ってね～～
Mix all ingredients together. Roll dough on plastic cutting board, dusting with lots of rice flour, so the flour will not stick to cutting board. Once the dough is rolled out smooth, place the dough on the plastic sheet in the freezer for approximately 5 minutes. Remove dough from freezer, and punch out your cookies with the cookie cutter shapes. Using spatula, carefully remove the cookies from the plastic sheet and place on baking sheet. I like to line my baking sheet with parchment paper, so the cookies do not burn. Bake in preheated oven at 345 Fahrenheit, until cookies are slightly golden. Do not over bake. Remove from oven and let cool on baking sheet. Once the cookies have completely cooled, remove from baking sheet and place on cooling rack. Feel free to frost your cookies, add sprinkles, decorate with pretty little edible flowers!
The first one I didn't think my colors through, and it was too late to fix anything. The background turned to mud.
He also says he is oppressed by an enemy, and he feels forgotten. “I say to God my Rock, Why have you forgotten me? Why must I go about mourning, oppressed by the enemy? My bones suffer mortal agony as my foes taunt me.” (V.9-10)
A bit of history: I’d been planning to go to the College of Santa Fe in New Mexico for creative writing, but after getting sick and being diagnosed with Crohn’s during senior year of high school, this plan was nixed and I had to hurriedly apply to anyone who would take me that wasn’t too far from my doctor. The University of Texas at Dallas accepted me on short notice.
He works her to the bone, makes her feel stupid and just when he’s about to make her climb lots of steps for his own sick pleasure, she fakes an injury. This means the tour is over and they get to have dinner with her co-workers.
My man gave these the stamp of approval served alongside a bowl of chili (I served them with Pumpkin Turkey Chili). They didn't get as hard as the biscotti that I've made in the past. I'm not sure if it's because I didn't bake them long enough or if this is how they're supposed to be. Regardless, they were delicious, and I'll make them again and again.
South Africa continues to grapple with corruption, growing social and economic inequalities, and the weakening of state institutions by partisan appointments and one-party dominance. Attacks on freedom of expression, particularly attempts by the ruling African National Congress (ANC) to tamper with media independence, raised serious concerns about the government’s commitment to the protection of basic civil and political rights. In April 2011, images of the brutal, public murder by the police of Andries Tatane during a peaceful protest in Ficksburg to demand better service delivery elicited public ire regarding police brutality. Despite these concerns, institutions of democracy, among them the South African Human Rights Commission and the Public Protector, remain highly active.
Tuesday - Goth decides that Jack Daniels is a beautiful friend and leaves
Total: 3090 new jobs, not 18,000 jobs.
38. HP and the Order of the Phoenix - Rowling (2003)
along with their 1970 album releases of “Workingman’s Dead”
First and foremost, it must be a SCENE -- with all the components of a scene in their proper places and proportions as delineated in those previous posts.
- Leaving on cool, starry nights after a long day
With its waves and its swells and its tides, the sea beats a rhythm that I see reflected everywhere. And in doing so, it makes me realise that the crazy roller coaster swirls of life are not crazy swirls at all. They are, in fact, the patterns that lie at the heart of everything.
I mulled...
Germany has two types of infringement (1) reproduction – which covers unchanged copying and (2) adaptation – which covers alterations of an existing work.
Maru, the chubby Japanese box-entering cat, has been getting quite a lot of attention lately. He’s not only appeared in American Fresh Step Kitty Litter commercials, but is now the subject of a catchy new song, the “Zen Maru the Cat Song.” Sing along, too: just follow the bouncing Maru head! The graphics near the end are awesome.
Amongst those myths, of course, is the belief that the modern Labour party retains some vestige of loyalty to the traditional British Working class. In terms of myths this belief can only be compared to the assumption that a pack of hungry hyenas might care a jot for the well being of a wounded antelope.
LH
Experiments similar to Caldeira’s proposal are already being carried out by U.S. government -backed scientists, such as those at the U.S. Department of Energy’s (DOE) Savannah River National Laboratory in Aiken, S.C, who this year conducted studies which involved shooting huge amounts of particulate matter, in this case “porous-walled glass microspheres,” into the stratosphere.
He looked miserable.
Just quit! Enough said. There are lots of tools and support groups out there these days to help you. Most insurance companies also cover smoking cessation, so make sure you ask about it. If you’ve already quit, good for you and keep it up! You’re making yourself and the people around you healthier by your decision to quit.
Yesterday we could tell their brains were about to bubble out of their ears from all of the review. We decided to take a break and make secret good luck cards. I called kids into the hall and they drew a classmate's name out of a bag. The student's jobs were to make good luck cards for their secret pal and we had an exchange at the end of the day. The secret about killed some of them, but they LOVED it! Some of the cards were SO sweet. I have the kindest bunch of children this year. I will definitely add this to my to do list every year. Here are a few examples:
Did you catch my impromptu Sunday post? I blogged about my hodge:podge interview, Ikea Hacker feature and joining the world of Pinterest (to which I've already lost many hours) - tell me if you're on Pinterest so I can start following you. I'm pretty lonely on Pinterest right now.
But Cory McAbee’s vision is fantastic. He proves to us that imagination and the art of storytelling are more alive in common people than Hollywood would have us believe. McAbee is part a small group of artists (like Shane Carruth from Primer fame) that are not held back by the mainstream production system and are able to deliver their story and vision to a willful and eager audience. Imperfections will be there, but it doesn’t matter: we need more Cory McAbees.
“We should investigate,” answered Hermel. “But carefully. There might be people needing rescue, but we are persons non-gratis there, remember… and Korfu is a wanted man.”
+1 Tweet this contest (leave link in comment)
3/ Your orange striped top is already unexpected, but teaming it with a contrasting green skirt amps up your style IQ and gives you a whole new sense of playfulness. Add some orange platform booties for a contemporary look or opt for nude sandals to play your look down.
I’d argue that the Private Equity model is less moral than Venture Capital. Venture Capital takes risks to build something pretty much from scratch, and if they’re successful, they make a lot of money, and if they’re not, they don’t.
Fill with instant hot from shower /kettle. (Less wasteful than heating tankful & not using within 24-48hr before it cools)
Do atrocities against civilians increase the willingness of the UN to deploy such operations, as demanded by the concept of R2P? The question of the conditions under which peacekeeping operations are established has been discussed from many perspectives, as summed up by Gilligan & Stedman (2003). Some scholars stress major powers' interests and "imperialistic motives", and it has in this tradition been claimed that UN operations are established in countries where the permanent members of the UN Security Council have national interest or major powers have raw material interests. Other approaches emphasize an interest in establishing democratic regimes as a motivating factor. Another major strand of thought claims that it is not outside countries' interests that are important, but rather the needs - in terms of war casualties and conflict durability - of the war-torn countries, and thus altruism rather than egoism on the part of the great powers. Still other approaches highlight the alleged importance of, e.g., a "CNN effect", the presence of a peace agreement, type of conflict, and the number of warring parties.
Not when you're the Devil's nephew. An unexpected message gives Frank the answer he's sought for years--Where did God and Lucifer go?--but the knowledge brings its own dilemma as inter-dimensional war looms, threatening to engulf the Earth.
- I wore NONE of these out, or for longer than picture-taking purposes.
by the way, my email account was hacked this morning.
I'm trying to take time while it's still warm to see a little bit more of Chicago. This week that didn't happen because I was swamped with school, but it's one of my goals before it turns frigid.
Which brings me to two shows that have just finished their runs: Being Human series 4 and Dirk Gently series 1. This is not a review per se - more a flurry of observations about why both shows didn't quite work for me this year. In essence, the problem I had with both is that they seemed to have lost their essential qualities. Let me explain ...
Inquisitor Exarch sticks around to get you the wins in slower matchups, you can blink him plenty of times to burn your opponent for 2 damage or, you can use him to gain some life to really pull of some sweet tricks with: Chalice of Life
The two sales above indicate that the sellers have taken discounts to the market value by reference to market yields. Of course there may well have been special circumstances which might have naturally led to reductions to the standard market price, issues with leases or tenants, planning issues etc. That said, the UK is a transparent market, certainly in comparison with Ireland and although NAMA is a big fish in Dublin, in London it is a significant player but in a sea with a large number of significant players. So information on NAMA sales will eventually seep out and it will be interesting to see if NAMA sales are consistently below what might be regarded as market value, particularly for prime assets.
Weekends are all about delectable eats. Well, that's how I roll, at least. Breakfasts are no longer a solo affair, lunches are lazy and extended, and there are endless opportunities for dinner date deliciousness. Tasty treats, crafting in the kitchen - I love it all.
Anyway, something has really struck me. This latest surge in popularity for Dystopian novels has been a fun thing. Well, you should read this book if you like that sort of stuff. Because guess what, we've had plenty of dystopias in the PAST. I totally feel like I'm reading a book about the future, where an evil government has taken away all of your rights and identity and what makes you unique. Where people live in daily fear of being arrested at a whim.
21. Too Much Too Young
Away in a manger,
Ironically, M. Tremblay ( considered along with a certain M. Houle ) is considered to be the villain in the ‘ Hunchback of Patrick Roy ‘saga. He used poor judgement with the former Conn Smythe winning net minder and caused a ‘Roy’ -al coup. Mario Tremblay committed a ‘ faux pas ‘ in hockey and in business . He let his personal feelings interfere with the end product – a winning hockey team.
Shall get linked up and so hope not to get distracted in blog land, with all those gorgeous creations, as I am one tired girl lol! DH has already gone to bed and I promised I would only be another half hour lol!
So its all relative, huh?
Good Monday morning! Gosh...it's almost afternoon! I was going to work on this post yesterday & I just didn't get around to it & one thing after another came up this morning... but here I am with another post on my favorite "in process" project.
If you've been using a digital camera for a while now, you probably already know the convenience of categorizing or labeling your digital photos. Most camera software will create new file folders on your computer's hard drive with the current date as the default folder name, thus making it easier to find photos when you're searching for them.
Last Friday I made the trip up to Des Moines, Iowa for the North Face 50 mile endurance challenge. Mark Stovall, myself and John King headed out from the Hotel friday to go see the course since we had not much idea of what we were getting into. Once we got to the Park entrance I could definitely tell this race had some money behind it. There were about 20 North Face tents, portable Ice coolers, Lighting systems, and banners and signs everywhere. We spent the next few hours following the course map, looking for markers to follow the next day. It was clear after we finished scouting the course that we were in for a lot of pavement running the following day, about 43 miles of the 50 was on pavement.
This sounds a bit more like a pop psychology sermon than it does an unschooling blog. Of course, unschooling is, at its most basic, an educational philosophy. Many people apply the principles of unschooling to other aspects of their lives such as bedtimes, media access, and food choices, taking unschooling from a purely educational choice to a lifestyle choice. For me, however, unschooling at its deepest is less an educational or lifestyle philosophy and more an approach to life which focuses on respect, love, freedom, and learning. As such, I cannot - or choose not to - simply apply the principles of unschooling to our approach to education while ignoring the amazingly positive influence they have had on our lives when fully embraced in all we do. I'm an all or nothing guy, I guess. So when I talk about "unschooling yourself", I am not talking about staying out of a classroom. I am talking about working with your family to create a life in which relationships are authentic and mutually respectful.
We Scots are especially prone to such hypocrisy. You have to reverse a line of Yeats. Instead of
“Mr Grew and Mr McCaughey put their lives in danger by being in the area of the sheds in the vicinity of a stolen car, which was expected to be used in terrorist activity,” the verdict stated.
We did, however, recently go through two months of homeopathic treatment where Heath and I were seeing a holistic doctor and going through acupressure and acupuncture. I also had to drink these crazy disgusting herbs 3 times a day for a month. (I have a video of me taking my last one that I will have to post one day so you can at least see how gross it is.) I did make several of my close friends and family try the herbs so they could testify to the disgustingness of them.
december is going to go by way fast and i'm a little saddened by that.
Needless to say, I'm totally psyched and can't wait for the weekend. I'll be posting a post-conference rap up (our quiz game that we play with a bunch of other families - trophy included - following conference). Until then, Happy Conference!!!! (Be sure to check lds.org for more information)
Well that is it for now… Take Care….
"I'll never give up my hounds," said Tom doggedly.
Pattern Paper is Heidi Grace 3.75" x 5"
So here's your challenge today...GET UP and GO DO something!!
Still, it's not going up quickly, so that's something. Or is it?
Please do check out Grace's post on the Vogue fashion spread for CofB over at The Beautiful Necessity! It is tremendously exciting to see more PRB-inspired fashion editorials so prominently featured. And don't forget that the exhibit is coming to the Legion of Honor Fine Arts Museum in San Francisco, and will run from February 18 - June 17. I am going to do my very best to go to this exhibit and report back, and would certainly love to hear your impressions if you are able to go.
* You can use a total of 4 ounces (120 g) semisweet chocolate if you prefer
The Big Chill (added 2/21)
453990 All other miscellaneous store retailers (including tobacco, candle, & trophy shops)
and said I love you, daddy.
Life has been CRAZY.
TheGuardian Duke by Jamie Carie
Sinn Féin hold commemoration in the Benedy Garda Chief Superintendent testifies against IRA accused Man shot in punishment style attack Third time the charm in BC archives battle? Jail for supergrass trial’s sole convict Martin McGuinness denies contact with Smithwick Tribunal Security fears for prison staff after details found in cell Specialist detectives review claims Brady knew of abuse ‘Irony’ over SF and 9/11 display Cardinal unfit for job he holds, says Smyth sex abuse victim Clerical child sex abuse Tánaiste calls on Cardinal Brady to resign Fracking firm gives €20,000 to forum Eastwood Slams RAAD Statement Lisburn woman’s tribute to great great grandmother Belfast Blitz’s unknown victims remembered as restored gravestone is unveiled Statement by Gerry McGeough Sale of 21 PSNI stations to go ahead ‘It’s better for the town’ Derry museum captures Bloody Sunday
She’s old and dishevelled. If you had enough time you would listen to the stories of all the crevices on her face. Sure that they would enlighten you with the purity of something real and stir you out of the comfort of your sheltered life. But there isn’t enough time. You could begin it, but the cadence would be left incomplete. Because you know that each narrative is not as shallow as your own and there would not be enough time left to continue. The people still flood in and out of the arcade you’ve found your way back to. And with the humiliation of dropping 10 Rupee’s into the ribbed and worn out silk that fashions her sari and rests in her lap, you sigh your conclusion. There is no grey. No love. No hate. It doesn’t matter. India chooses you.
Box 6:
We uses to have special tools for this procedure. I was smiling when I found a pressure gage in my car, a remnant of my past life, good know how long it has been laying between seats ending up under it.
e) If you could change one thing about yourself, what would it be?
For sure, some college degrees are more marketable than others, but I like the approach of Singletary’s Washington Post editorial better.
We are about half way through the second album which we're very pleased with the progress of and really hope we can get it out there later in the year. The working title is 'You're Coming To London', which I thought was the phrase lucky contestants on the likes of X-Factor would hear if they had enjoyed a successful audition. So I thought it was nice and cheeky for a second album title. However, when I've mentioned it to people they've looked at me blankly so I may have that wrong.
An elderly couple walk into a restaurant and order one hamburger, fry’s and a soda..
Fast forward 20 years or so, and our oldest daughter is 3. She knows what communion is and what it represents because she’s asked us about it. But following in the tradition in which my wife and I were raised, we’d been passing the plates over her head during worship.
B: Forget about that, lets go into the story. About a girl named blah-blah-blah that adored me.
"It's just one more thing we've failed at."
These experiences define him and draw down the antagonism of the puritanical Christians who now control his country, who burn books and execute heretics, and who want to impose their worldview on those who do not share it.
sticking until you are ready to cook them.) Dip your fingers in water and moisten the edges of the wrapper. Place a heaping teaspoon of filling in
All 46 of the missing students eventually were found, and had miraculous survival stories. This principal had previously prayed with confidence that God would protect! There wasn’t a dry eye in the church, and apparently I had some tears left after my morning reflection, too.
So he referred me to some witchy witch doctor that supposedly would be able to do the job, but again, because he was so LAAAAAAMMMEEE he spelled the guy’s freakin’ name wrong. So I couldn’t reach him. And Google wasn’t much help because apparently looking up ‘witchy witch doctor to perform teeth surgery on terrorist-eating robot’ didn’t come up with much.
He gave up striking to become a goalie. At 6’5″ he would have been a very good “target man”.
Now just uploading a card I made yesterday but left it too late to get a decent photo.
In my six nights in BA, the earliest I went to sleep was around 4am and I never made it to the free hostel breakfast at 10:30am. My nights were spent at the variety of clubs around the city where the music was always good, the girls were dressed to kill and (I think) the drinks came cheap. Did I mention the girls were dressed to kill?
The mother has a right to her feelings of loss, betrayal, anger, hurt, and anything else she feels. Like me, the mother, might not realize the price that was paid for her child. That brings upon a new level of guilt into the mix. It feels like I sold my child, even though I did not. Her feelings do not negate the adopters or the adoptee. They might all be the same story but each person has different views.
Me, I'm working seriously on two projects:
My chest and leg wounds are healing really well and I am no longer on pain killers but I will of course be on medication for life.
SO for such a monumental post, I thought I would just say hello and thanks to all the readers and commentators and subscribers of Mr Oh’s Little Black Musings.
7. Shock Rock- I love this song; it’s short and sweet and is one of the heavier, more electronic numbers on the Tanx album. It’s one of my favourite songs because it’s so simple and meaningless- it doesn’t get better than this.
yes, she does have a moustache; no, she doesn't have tits.
I've told people that I'm fine instead of good, for fuck's sake!
:: Exercising and stretching regularly.
As I warned you at the beginning of this post, the journalling is painful. Not to me, but because I didn't know any of it until the day before she died when she told everything to me knowing that she would be gone very soon. All my life I adored my maternal grandfather and it has taken me more than 10 years to be able to even think of him without bursting into tears and feeling hatred.
Look: there it goes, soundless, tremulous, a few timid glances, a frustrated gesture, a poem about kif, an evening’s worth of delirium, and then, nothing.
But my parents wanted to remain a couple, she said -- the story of which I'm intrigued by, tempted to write. They'd already started talking about marriage by the end of those four weeks. So they courted by airmail for the entire four years that my father was studying to become a doctor.
2. You will never ever find yourself in such an easy position to meet someone of the opposite sex. Unless you’re going to grad school you won’t be studying, eating, sitting, and partying next to a ton of single men or women again. Once you go to work you’re limited to co-workers, folks you meet going out, and whoever you run into on the street. It’s not the same.
A NEW FOOTER ON LOVE/LIFE IS IN THE WORKS! AM EXCITED!!!
Here are the details:
This isn't me being sexist, or manist or whatever other 'ist' you can think of. This is me telling a true story of two men and a washing machine.... or is that four men?
-I'm already on Blogger so I won't have to worry about transferring content and followers over.
Edmondson: (Assumes arty arty voice) It was a real artistic success, it was under budget (laughs).
ties in commemoration of the first class. My hair is way long in these
We organized a “Storehouse Saturday” for the ward. About 8 members went to the storehouse together where they purchased and canned foods they wanted to add to their food storage.
This court acknowledges that the standard requiring control or direction for a finding of joint infringement may in some circumstances allow parties to enter into arms-length agreements to avoid infringement. Nonetheless, this concern does not outweigh concerns over expanding the rules governing direct infringement. For example, expanding the rules governing direct infringement to reach independent conduct of multiple actors would subvert the statutory scheme for indirect infringement. Direct infringement is a strict-liability offense, but it is limited to those who practice each and every element of the claimed invention. By contrast, indirect liability requires evidence of "specific intent" to induce infringement. Another form of indirect infringement, contributory infringement under § 271(c), also requires a mens rea (knowledge) and is limited to sales of components or materials without
Things are improving, though Tuesday was tinged with sadness as it was the 25th anniversary of the loss of our first pregnancy. Despite the years I'll never forget the feelings of helplessness as our hopes slipped away, the emptiness that followed and the physical ache that came from knowing I would never hold that baby.
The Roman sailors did all they knew to do. Sailing in 64AD was quite primitive, especially as compared to today. They had little, if any, navigational equipment. We have already seen that they had no way of forecasting the weather. But they did all they knew to do. They undergirded the ship. Today we call that frapping.
Because of said recital there is a costume. One of the reasons I like the studio we attend is the costumes are low key and very age appropriate. Evil Cute outfits for little girls – nothing sexy or too old for children.
If I could just get organized!
2012 is going to be a busy year for me. I’m also currently working on my own projects and building my production company up – (cravenproductions.co.uk). I am also working with other producers on their projects. I’m lined up for three features in 2012 which I am looking forward to. I also plan to go back to Los Angeles for film/TV auditions and workshops.
Well we rushed the first EP, we got the band together in June ’08 and had to have the album written and recorded by August ’08, so the band has changed a lot in that time, these days we’re challenging each other a lot more and everyone is writing music that just keeps getting better.
Perception 5.2 Average
They lived together and had a common law
“The next room? You mean the huge pile of morning glory? What were you even thinking? We need the flowers for tomorrow!”
Thursday later p.m.: drive back to Austin after work
the moment, a serviceman coming home to his family for Christmas. Now, serving us—the panicked and afraid.
As seen in the popular United States magazine Sew It All last year, this pattern is now available as a paper pattern or e-pattern version.
Add to that the fact that they have been battling an intestinal parasite and don't like to sleep for more than 1 consecutive hour at night, and I am left with NO spare time. If I can gather a minute while the boys are napping… I am napping too.
Love shows up in all forms, even very small and cheeky forms. It has never been a model. Flowers and romantic moments are only used and appear on the surface of the relationship. Under all this, the pillar of true love stands... and that's our life.
Balanced against those remarks is his persistent defense of women’s rights, his criticisms about how religion treated women, and his constant refrain that societies could improve only if they empowered women and gave them reproductive rights. (This despite his personal dislike of abortion—in that case he admirably separated his personal views from political necessities). So often these days, especially on atheist websites, a touch of sexism or boorishness, or even a criticism of a woman, is instantly condemned as “misogyny.”
The rules. And no breaking them, it's VERY BAD FORM.
a baby doll (Micah) Short with blonde hair (Jaela)
"We call it a football wedding."
smoking
We have had over 4 inches of rain in the last day or so, and I think that will do.
Hi, my name is Abbie, I am 3 years old and I am staying at my grandma and grandpa's this weekend. My Mommy got my Daddy tickets to the OU vs Tulsa game in NORMAN, OK in the 24th row and two nights in a hotel.. Mommy said Daddy's head exploded because he was so excited. They said I couldn't go to Boomer Sooner.. maybe some day I will be old enough..
Love to your Ma
My approach has changed since 2010. In 2010 I did a picture for each day. In 2011 I relaxed on the picture a day and just put in the pictures that I had over the week. They may have been from several days and sometimes even just a couple of days. 2012 will be similar to 2011.
Mill workers demand:
If Tommy from the Wolverine story becomes a revolutionary later, after the first revolution fails, maybe there’s that kind of hope. But I don’t think he’s going to do that. Mostly he’s going to be pursuing his knowledge of the aliens’ civilization… he’s going to be greedy for it. He doesn’t like the dirt, he doesn’t like being hungry. Still, there ought to be a way to make “There’s no going back” fall in line with something like hope.
your skin has a touch of pearl,
The bill now heads to the Senate, where related cybersecurity legislation has been stalled for years, and the threat of a presidential veto makes speedy approval unlikely.
Enrolled my daughters into school.
So, I have been slacking a bit, with blogging and with running. Naughty tortoise.
The truly odd thing about this whole fiasco is that Barenboim conducted what remained of Berg’s score superbly, so much so that one could almost, especially if one knew the score, fill in the gaps. Despite the ruptures, there was a true understanding of both dramatic and musical flow and the generative nature of Berg’s serial writing. Allied to a Staatskapelle Berlin on fine form, its dark, ‘old German’ sound a true joy to hear in this repertoire, one had a frustrating sense of what might have been. Much of the singing impressed too. Mojca Erdmann occasionally struggled, her voice running out of steam at one point until she elected to resume her cruelly high line an octave lower, but for the most part she sang as well as she acted: a credible doll-like approach that permitted all manner of coloratura parallels to be drawn. Michael Volle sang as well as one might have expected, in a role he seems well on the way to be making his own. If occasionally a little wobblier than one often hears in this part, Deborah Polaski’s Geschwitz was a forthright performance. If she did not tug on the heartstrings as one might hope, that was surely more a matter of the production and its cuts than anything else. Thomas Piffka sometimes sounded forced as Alwa, his lines consequently lacking shape, but elsewhere sang well enough. Stephan Rügamer was compelled to perform a very odd caricatured Negro dance, surely more offensive than anything alleged to be found in the opera itself, but nevertheless emerged with credit, as did Georg Nigl’s Athlete, who also had to perform a great deal of shadow-boxing in the background. Jürgen Linn’s Schigolch made surprisingly little impression, but again that may have been at least as much a matter of the production as anything else. The whole lasted about three hours, including one interval.
His one ear hung tattered and torn, flapping loosely in time to the rhythmic waving of his other perfect ear. It told of battles won and lost along the ancient pathways of the elephant fields. He moved steadily straight towards us filling my lens with his giant shape. He was caked with mud, clods of which sat in a ridge down his spine, andclung to the deep wrinkles of his skin- like a mountain of earth come to life. Liquid golden eyes looked down at me, focussing sharply - waiting for me to move out his way. He drew himself up to enormous height. My camera pointed directly up now, and we stared - golden eye to electronic eye. There was a moment hung in time. Steadily the earth mountain creature swung his great head away and he moved off into the track behind us continuing on his way. I breathed deeply. Wow.
7/8 cup all-purpose flour
a carcinogen and neurotoxin, may be as hazardous to children as lead. Current regulations are based on threats to adults; recent studies show possible links with learning disabilities and retardation in children.
Me - Rhythm guitar
As for the oranges, I took them all and zested them using a cheese grater. I then squeezed all the juice, strained it, and reduced it on the stove top on low to thicken it up and hopefully give me a bit of a marmalade type flavor. The zest went into the beer when it was ~120F and found its way into the fermentor. The vanilla and oak will be added once the beer is done fermenting.
Many Silesians fled before the Red Army, and got a cold welcome further west; some refugee 'treks' like the ones I've described in Last Train from Kummersdorf were still wandering around a year later, unable to find anywhere to stay. The diarist Ruth Andreas-Friedrich described a barefoot Silesian child in one of these miserable processions who said: 'My feet hurt.' She lifted them up and they were raw and bleeding.
As an unemployed new mom in the Chicago suburbs, I applied for a free lance position at the local newspaper. Soon, I had my own neighborhood column. I heard about Write to Publish on a local radio station and attended my first writers’ conference. I met a wonderful acquisitions editor from Thomas Nelson and sold my first book – a gift book called A Mother’s Heart Knows. My entry into the publishing world officially began. In a separate blog, I will write about how I found my first literary agent. It was through a wrong phone number!
Sudanese officials said that South Sudan’s fighters have exercised deliberate sabotage and set fire on the oil infrastructures in Heglig.
There are various Himachal tour packages, which makes your trip easier and comfortable. Though the cost of any of the tour packages depends upon the number of days, numbers of tourists as well as facilities and comforts avail during the Himachal tour. The cost of Himachal tour packages include the transportation cost in exploring Himachal, accommodation selected, daily breakfast and dinner for the selected number of days, all applicable hotel taxes and service taxes. The costs of the Himachal tour packages do not include the cost of any of the entry ticket, cost of telephone or laundry, lunch and some other things. You can explore beautiful destinations of Himachal Pradesh nicely with the help of Himachal tour packages only.
That sounds great, but the reality is that it’s not so simple. The language of science and technology is very masculine and hirearchical and unless there is a concerted effort to actively include them, women continue to get lost in the shuffle. A paragraph allows for (potential) equality, but not equity.
Well this was my first week taking classes at the University. I am experiencing a lot of new things all at once. I'm getting used to walking all. day. long. When I got home on the first day, I ran and looked in the mirror and couldn't believe I was still fat. I thought for sure I'd lost 50 or 60 pounds walking all over campus carrying a backpack full of books in the 106 degree heat. But, alas, no. Skinny apparently is not in the cards for me.
I think the term ‘black’ is almost more offensive than ‘nigger’ because it is a ridiculous word.
Crank Up the BBQ–Grilled Ribeye Steak
Even if they're here for a short while.
So, we’ve got an equal presence of women watching movies (market) and the studios wanting to make money (motive). The result I draw is that the movies that are green lit are the movies people want to see. Or, more accurately, the movies studios think people want to see.
Witness Statements
I loved Judy to.
I'm going to start uploading some of my radio shows to Mixcloud in the weeks to come. More on that later.
He immediately waved his hand graciously, like I had just said, "no, I'm out of printer toner, but I can get it for you on Tuesday." He smiled a little smile and replied, "that's ok. I understand."
I have several ropes and a heavy duty military vest which I fastened hooks to. I tie the ropes to the hooks and then lower myself inch by inch down into the sewer. It is not like Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles, where the bottom of the sewer is clearly 6 feet below the entrance.
..and this final thought: That large peak you see in the background is called Huayna Picchu and you can hike up to its top if you have the legs for it.
For colour work, I usually use gouache paint on paper, or acrylics on paper. My black and white work is usually pen and ink or graphite pencil. For my personal and gallery work, I experiment with mixed media like collage, oil pastels and pastels.
The day before, I spent three hours driving from one store to another trying to find slacks in my size. To my dismay, I discovered that not a single one of the stores I visited carried anything with an inseem longer than 32". Finally, because a late afternoon meeting that day was the reason I was driving around looking for pants, I visited a slightly fancier caliber of store. After hours of searching, I found a decent pair of pants that fit well enough.
I am an extremely attractive male, alluring and mysterious. Everything you could ever dream. And more. I am like a wolf that you want to tame but deep down know that you can’t, and you are ok with that. I am also gentle and sensitive. I am very comfortable with my (hetero)sexuality. My personal hygiene is second to none. I enjoy the music of Michael Bolton, rearing jungle cats and I have a motorcycle. If your application proves unsuccessful and you do not hear from me please don’t be bummed. It’s not you, it’s me. I just have high standards. Soz :( In the words of Jay Z, and later Cher Lloyd from X Factor, “it’s the hard-knock life, for us. It’s the hard-knock life, for us”.
“What’s invincible mean?”
I put five candles on the inside because I'm taking my granddaughter to her cousin's 5th birthday party. She's 6 months older than my Bella (and she's actually MY cousin's daughter).
the willow unfolds her branches of gold
1 box devil's food cake mix
He’s our creator ,he give us life, sight ,hearing ,taste ,besides priceless gifts.He brought us to life and light .We were born to savour all beauty of life, to feel the velvet touch of hope in a flower ,in a tree leaf ,in a rose petal or in a butterfly caress .He created me ,and he’s the one ,the only one who has to judge me, to punish me .He ‘s the fountain of all these blessings and I owe him ; I don’t owe you anything.
1/2 cup chopped fresh parsley
Lacy Maguire is a successful photographer who is going through some problems in her personal life. She is divorced from her cheating husband, has a mom that only wants to help the only way she knows how and now a man who is wanted by the police standing in her living room. Things couldn’t get much worse for Lacy until she starts to feel attracted to this supposedly dirty cop. But Chase Kelly will set her straight on what really happened and how things are going to be between them.
"Ey Wade has written a unique and important book that put all racial History under one umbrella. Wade has done a tremendous job collecting information on all races, and all subjects related to them. "Beads on a String" is a piece of History that was missing until this book came out. I highly recommend this book to anyone wishing to understand more about
15. Wow. My weekend is packed.
I did it again.
No one can take my place in your life.
2) Melt butter in a large skillet over medium heat until milk solids on bottom are a dark chocolate brown and butter smells nutty. Transfer to a shallow bowl and place in freezer to cool until just congealed. (Butter should be somewhat solid for mixing stage.)
6: Going To California
Drake plays a hunch. He tells Sir James that he knows exactly the extent of his knowledge -- he sees that his hunch has hit home, and continues -- knows that Sir James has been stealing from him right and left, made him penniless. Now that you have me in your power, he says, what do you want?
At some point I’ll have to post about “Acceptable” technical graphics and the hidden semiotics of science imagery. Need more coffee for that though. After the gap – a bit of nerdliness. Click an arrow or something if you’re phobic about science (no math here yet – haven’t figured out WordPress equations)
“I know everyone’s been speculating about what we will do.
All employment contract types reported gains in employment, notably temporary work (+7.1%) and agency work (+8.0%). Temporary work now represents 3.87 million workers or 30.1% of the workforce.
Many of us don't think much about being a donor... unless something happens to us or a loved one.... then the thinking.. the doing begins, doesn't it?
Can we stay on edge?
The main square seemed lively compared to the rest of the village. In the square, we chose an outdoor table with an umbrella. The rain had stopped, but those tables were the only ones with dry chairs.
I love it steamed, until it's crispy tender and still nicely green . . . dipped into melted lemon butter, or hollandaise sauce . . . it's also a real treat used as soldiers instead of toast with your soft boiled eggs. It makes beautiful pasta dishes, even more gorgeously delicious . . . goes wonderfully with chicken . . .
I have made two different gifts. The first one I made for my Sister-in-law and gave her her gift of Wonder Woman Pajamas in it. I have been dying to post it, but didn't want to blow the surprise. She got it Sunday night, and I haven't posted since then. :-)
2-Do not start to cry.
This year, Debbie Olson will be working with Ken to teach the drawing classes. You will be using Copic markers and supplies, traveling around the Italian countryside, learning to draw in a country famous for producing amazing artists. (art by Ken O'Connell)
To allow the ego to fall away, one technique is to use the “Don’t Know” mind.
My girls enjoying their cookie. . .
Lower bitrate codecs allow more users, but they also have more distortion. Beyond the initial increase in distortion, lower bit rate codecs also achieve their lower bit rates by using more complex algorithms that make certain assumptions, such as those about the media and the packet loss rate. Other codecs may not make those same assumptions. When a user with a low bitrate codec talks to a user with another codec, additional distortion is introduced by each transcoding.
On another note, the G-man & I are back in our home.
Add chopped onion and minced garlic
The problem can be summer up with the following anecdote. I went to see Hulk o a whim when I saw it was playing at an afternoon matinee on my way to Taco Bell. I had a day off from summer session of classes at Regent Law and I just decided to go alone to see it. About 35 minutes into the film, I heard a little bot whisper to his father, ’Is the Hulk gonna how up now?”
After 9/11 America invaded Afghanistan and Iraq. Allied troops were also deployed to these countries. Sadly many soldiers have lost their lives since 9/11. According to icasualties 4792 soldiers of the coalition forces have lost their lives in Irag since 2003 and 2712 in Afghanistan since 2001. I don't know about other countries but I know that here in Australia when a soldier who has been deployed is killed it makes prime time news and front page of the papers. Rightly so too, don't get me wrong, loss of life through war is so wrong and such a waste, particularly a war that I don't believe should be occurring or that we should be involved in. These lives are commemorated in their death and remembered, they are all victims of 9/11.
So how in the heck did they break sod on the prairie all day long?
Look at what Pope Benedict XVI says about the Eucharist: “In the Eucharistic celebration we do not invent something, but we enter into a reality that precedes us, more than that, which embraces heaven and earth and, hence, also the past, the future and the present. This universal openness, this encounter with all the sons and daughters of God is the grandeur of the Eucharist: we go to meet the reality of God present in the body and blood of the Risen One among us.”
Last, but not least, is the claim that Bingham wasn’t actually the first man to visit Machu Picchu. It was certainly visited by local Indians over the preceding centuries, for example the farmers Arteaga, Richartes and Alvarez who had been living on the site since 1904 and paid a annual fee of 12 soles for farming rights on the property. During his visit Bingham found evidence of a visit by a group of Peruvians in 1902. He may not even have been the first non-Peruvian to reach the site as there is some evidence that a German, Augusto Berns, may well have been there in the 1860s and an Englishman Thomas Payne possibly visited in 1906. Many explorers had come very close to stumbling across the ruins during various expeditions in the 19th century. The exploration of the Machu Picchu region pre-Bingham will be explained in more detail later on in this article.
was also a divinity school attached to Kenyon College and I believe that
Anyone watching ABC's The River? I like it enough to see where it goes for a few weeks. If you missed the first few episodes you can catch up here. If you want the quick version: They're on a boat in the Amazon searching for their lost father/husband/friend who went on some sort of magical quest. So far...monster, bugwalker, creepy doll tree, everyone goes blind(temporarily) and now you're all caught up for Tuesday's episode. I also really enjoy Once Upon A Time and Lost Girl. Grimm on the other hand has completely fallen off my radar.
Since this giveaway is all about the faeries and fantasies I didn't want to giveaway a book people already have, so I thought why not let y'all pick?
History's window closes quickly. Get the stories while you can.
a poor substitute for bravery.
I know the odds for successful CPR are fairly low.
That's a good question. I think we're doing pretty well, with blogs like these discussing the books, and organisations like Sisters in Crime who work so hard to bring readers and writers together and let the wider reading public know what's happening in the crime fiction world. I guess every author would like more exposure for their own books but there is only so much media space out there, and so many books are being published. I think writing a good book that grows its own good word of mouth is what matters - and the writing part is certainly the only bit of it authors can control.
#7 I have been working on the porches and trying to get flowers planted, in my spare time. Again, no "after" pictures so that post will come later.
Anyways, if you are ever in the mood for fish or if you or someone you know don’t like fish, this could be the place that changes that. Just make sure you check their hours (posted on the yelp link). Keep in mind, it’s closed Sundays. For some reason, I crave it a lot on Sunday when it is closed and it drives me crazy.
An hour away from home, the lights on the car went out. It was 4:00 in the morning, and nobody was on the road. The car just died right there on the interstate like a little bitch. Andy tried to figure out what was wrong with it, but considering we were at least a few miles from a gas station, there wasn't much we could do.
My set for 5 September featured classic swing, to wit:
Popularized by the likes of 9GAG, they’ve become something of a cult phenomenon, and we’ll openly admit that a few of us here at our company are somewhat hooked.
To find things easily, you can click on the categories above (such as “apparel” or “decorations”) or scroll down to the bottom of the page for specific tags (such as “gown” or “table centerpiece”).
Expelled – by Ben Stein
Third, was a mixture of tempura, peking duck, yum cha (dumpling, siomai, prawn in rice noodle) and some other foods I can’t even recall now!
Bamberg Symphoniker-Ingo Metzmacher
Recently I’ve been having a lot of those moments. The moments where I feel that I’m not in control any more. These are the moments where my reason-ability and logic are thrown out the window. If I was able, I would float outside of my body and look down and see someone different. Someone I don’t know. Someone who is not in control.
Mix the chicken mixture through the pasta and pile into an ovenproof dish, sprinkle over the grated cheese and put in an oven at 200C for about 10 minutes until brown and bubbling.
it seems i've been lucky and had several weekends where the football part got put on the back burner and some girl time in the grove took priority. i am certainly not complaining....
13.Keep it Up
The pulley system -
Pour the liquid into the larger bowl, and combine it all together, mixing with your hands (they're your best kitchen tool.)
Week 3: Monday, Sept. 24, Green Bay, 5:30 PM
Calm down, calm down, I know how to count. I simply had the genius idea to limit my Christmas crafting in this next year to two distinct months--August and September. (I'm sure I'll write a post to explain the reasoning behind that decision and choice of months in the future.) So no catch-up crafting during that time, and I need October for Halloween costumes. Hence, nine sets of bags. I marked the Sewing bags with an "S" and the knitting bags with a "K." It's crazy complicated, but I'm sure I can spare the brain cells to remember my system throughout the year. I threw the bags up onto the top shelf in the closet to wait out the year.
Medical care.
Dear Wolfwoman,
i will be teaching a new class at Michael's starting next month titled "flowers WOW!". these are the wonderful creations we will come up with! just because you're you, and i love you, i'm gonna share my how-to with these. super simple!!
The EEG tracings were obtained from 15 children whose age ranges from 3 to 7 years old. These tracings were clustered according to the severity of autism of the children based on the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th Edition, Text Revision (DSM IV-TR) criteria. The children either have severe, mild, or no autism. Each cluster consisted of 5 children. An example of a digitized trace is shown in fig 1.
from one side of the house to the other,
It looks like I should probably explain what I’ve been up to for the last how many months.
The high-profile removal is linked to Qatar and Bakun projects’ cost overruns
